

Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version













  IGLEU:NASDAQ CM Stock Quote - Eagleline Acquisition Corp - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Eagleline Acquisition Corp   IGLEU:US   NASDAQ CM    Pending Listing   IGLEU:US is pending listing   USD             Volume   0                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding   -    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -                Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Eagleline Acquisition Corp. provides financial services. The Company offers services such as capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, and reorganization. Eagle Acquisition conducts its business globally.    Address  595 East Lancaster AvenueSuite 300Radnor, PA 19087United States   Phone  1-610-229-9070   Website   -     Executives Board Members    Steven Fishman "Steve"  Chief Executive Officer    Joseph L Fox  President     Show More         










EAGLELINE ACQUISITION CORP. (IGLEU) IPO - NASDAQ.com

































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO Overview





EAGLELINE ACQUISITION CORP. (IGLEU) IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
EAGLELINE ACQUISITION CORP.


Company Address
C/O SHELBOURNE CAPITAL LLC595 EAST LANCASTER AVENUE, SUITE 300RADNOR, PA 19087


Company Phone
(610) 229-9070


Company Website
 -- 


CEO
Steven Fishman


Employees  (as of 11/15/2016) 
2


State of Inc
 -- 


Fiscal Year End
12/31


Status
Filed (10/14/2016)


Proposed Symbol
IGLEU


Exchange
NASDAQ Capital


Share Price
$10.00


Shares Offered
15,000,000


Offer Amount
$172,500,000.00


Total Expenses
$750,000.00


Shares Over Alloted
2,250,000


Shareholder Shares Offered
 -- 


Shares Outstanding
18,750,000


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
 -- 


Quiet Period Expiration
 -- 


CIK
0001675776




We are offering 15,000,000 units at an offering price of $10.00 per unit. We
estimate that the net proceeds of this offering together with the funds we will
receive from the sale of the private placement warrants will be used as set
forth in the following table.

                                                            Without        
                                                        Over-Allotment      Over-Allotment  
                                                            Option         Option Exercised 
Gross proceeds                                                                              
Gross proceeds from units offered to public(1)         $   150,000,000     $   172,500,000  
Gross proceeds from private placement warrants                                             
offered in the                                                                             
private placement                                            5,475,000           6,037,500  
Total gross proceeds                                   $   155,475,000     $   178,537,500  
Offering expenses(2)                                                                        
Underwriting commissions (2.65% of gross proceeds                                          
from units offered to public, excluding deferred                                           
portion)(3)                                            $     3,975,000     $     4,537,500  
Legal fees and expenses                                        300,000             300,000  
Accounting fees and expenses                                    50,000              50,000  
SEC/FINRA filing fees                                           44,000              44,000  
Printing and engraving expenses                                 45,000              45,000  
Directors and officers insurance                               100,000             100,000  
NASDAQ listing and filing fees                                  75,000              75,000  
Miscellaneous expenses                                         136,000             136,000  
Total offering expenses (other than underwriting                                           
commissions)                                           $       750,000     $       750,000  
Proceeds after offering expenses                       $   150,750,000     $   173,250,000  
Held in trust account                                  $   150,000,000     $   172,500,000  
% of public offering size                                          100 %               100 %
Not held in trust account                              $       750,000     $       750,000  

The following table shows the use of the approximately $750,000 of net proceeds
not held in the trust account(4).

                                                                           % of    
                                                          Amount          Total    
Legal, accounting, due diligence, travel, and other                               
expenses in connection with any business                                          
combination(5)                                         $     300,000         40.0 %
Legal and accounting fees related to regulatory                                   
reporting obligations                                        150,000         20.0 %
Payment for office space, administrative and support                              
services                                                     240,000         32.0 %
Other miscellaneous expenses (including NASDAQ                                    
continued listing fees, reserve for liquidation                                   
expenses and franchise taxes net of anticipated                                   
interest income)                                              60,000          8.0 %
Total                                                  $     750,000        100.0 %

(1) Includes amounts payable to public stockholders who properly redeem their
    shares in connection with our successful completion of our initial business
    combination.

(2) A portion of the offering expenses have been paid from the proceeds of loans 
    from our sponsor of up to $150,000 as described in this prospectus. These 
    loans will be repaid upon completion of this offering out of the $750,000 of
    offering proceeds that has been allocated for the payment of offering 
    expenses other than underwriting commissions. In the event that offering 
    expenses are less than set forth in this table, any such amounts will be 
    used for post-closing working capital expenses.

(3) The underwriters have agreed to defer underwriting commissions equal to
    3.35% of the gross proceeds of this offering. Upon completion of our initial
    business combination, $5,025,000, which constitutes the underwriters’
    deferred commissions (or up to $5,812,500 if the underwriters’ 
    over-allotment option is exercised in full) will be paid to the underwriters 
    from the funds held in the trust account, and the remaining funds will be 
    released to us and can be used to pay all or a portion of the purchase price 
    of the target business or businesses in our initial business combination or 
    for general corporate purposes, including for maintenance or expansion of 
    operations of the post-transaction company, the payment of principal or 
    interest due on indebtedness incurred in completing our initial business 
    combination, to fund the purchase of other companies or for working capital. 
    The underwriters will not be entitled to any interest accrued on the
    deferred underwriting commissions.

(4 These expenses are estimates only. Our actual expenditures for some or all
   of these items may differ from the estimates set forth herein. For example, 
   we may incur greater legal and accounting expenses than our current estimates 
   in connection with negotiating and structuring a business combination based 
   upon the level of complexity of such business combination. In the event we 
   identify an acquisition target in a specific industry subject to specific 
   regulations, we may incur additional expenses associated with legal due 
   diligence and the engagement of special legal counsel. In addition, our 
   staffing needs may vary and as a result, we may engage a number of 
   consultants to assist with legal and financial due diligence. We do not 
   anticipate any change in our intended use of proceeds, other than 
   fluctuations among the current categories of allocated expenses, which 
   fluctuations, to the extent they exceed current estimates for any specific 
   category of expenses, would not be available for our expenses. The amount in 
   the table above does not include interest available to us from the trust 
   account. Based on current interest rates, we would expect approximately
   $60,000 to be available to us from interest earned on the funds held in the
   trust account over 24 months following the closing of this offering; however, we
   can provide no assurances regarding this amount. This estimate assumes an
   interest rate of 0.02% per annum based upon current yields of securities in
   which the trust account may be invested. In addition, in order to finance
   transaction costs in connection with an intended initial business combination, 
   our sponsor or an affiliate of our sponsor or certain of our officers and   
   directors may, but are not obligated to, loan us funds as may be required. If we
   complete our initial business combination, we would repay such loaned amounts
   out of the proceeds of the trust account released to us. Otherwise, such loans
   would be repaid only out of funds held outside the trust account. In the event
   that our initial business combination does not close, we may use a portion of
   the working capital held outside the trust account to repay such loaned amounts
   but no proceeds from our trust account would be used to repay such loaned
   amounts. Up to $1,500,000 of such loans may be convertible into warrants of the
   post business combination entity at a price of $1.00 per warrant at the option
   of the lender. The warrants would be identical to the private placement warrants  
   issued to our sponsor. The terms of such loans by our sponsor, affiliates of our
   sponsor, or certain of our officers and directors, if any, have not been
   determined and no written agreements exist with respect to such loans. We do not
   expect to seek loans from parties other than our sponsor or its affiliates as we
   do not believe third parties will be willing to loan such funds and provide a
   waiver against any and all rights to seek access to funds in our trust account.

(5) Includes estimated amounts that may also be used in connection with our
    business combination to fund a “no shop” provision and commitment fees for
    financing.

The NASDAQ rules provide that at least 90% of the gross proceeds from this
offering and the private placement be deposited in a trust account. Of the net
proceeds of this offering and the sale of the private placement warrants,
approximately $150.0 million (or approximately $172.5 million if the
underwriters’ over-allotment option is exercised in full), including $5,025,000
(or up to $5,812,500 if the underwriters’ over-allotment option is exercised in
full) of deferred underwriting commissions will be placed in a trust account
with Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company acting as trustee and will be
invested only in U.S. government treasury bills with a maturity of 180 days or
less or in money market funds meeting certain conditions under Rule 2a-7 under
the Investment Company Act which invest only in direct U.S. government treasury
obligations. Based on current interest rates, we estimate that the interest
earned on the trust account will be approximately $60,000 per year, assuming an
interest rate of 0.02% per year. We will not be permitted to withdraw any of the
principal or interest held in the trust account, except with respect to interest
earned on the funds held in the trust account that may be released to us to pay
our taxes, if any, the proceeds from this offering will not be released from the
trust account until the earliest of (i) the completion of our initial business
combination, (ii) the redemption of any public shares properly tendered in
connection with a stockholder vote to amend our amended and restated certificate
of incorporation to modify the substance and timing of our obligation to redeem
100% of our public shares if we do not complete our initial business combination
within 24 months from the closing of this offering and (iii) the redemption of
all of our public shares if we are unable to complete our business combination
within 24 months from the closing of this offering, subject to applicable law.
Based on current interest rates, we do not expect that interest earned on the
trust account will be sufficient to pay taxes.

The net proceeds held in the trust account may be used as consideration to pay
the sellers of a target business with which we ultimately complete our business
combination. If our initial business combination is paid for using equity or
debt securities, or not all of the funds released from the trust account are
used for payment of the consideration in connection with our business
combination, we may apply the balance of the cash released from the trust
account for general corporate purposes, including for maintenance or expansion
of operations of the post-transaction company, the payment of principal or
interest due on indebtedness incurred in completing our initial business
combination, to fund the purchase of other companies or for working capital.

We believe that amounts not held in trust will be sufficient to pay the costs
and expenses to which such proceeds are allocated. This belief is based on the
fact that while we may begin preliminary due diligence of a target business in
connection with an indication of interest, we intend to undertake in-depth due
diligence, depending on the circumstances of the relevant prospective
acquisition, only after we have negotiated and signed a letter of intent or
other preliminary agreement that addresses the terms of a business combination.
However, if our estimate of the costs of undertaking in-depth due diligence and
negotiating a business combination is less than the actual amount necessary to
do so, we may be required to raise additional capital, the amount, availability
and cost of which is currently unascertainable. If we are required to seek
additional capital, we could seek such additional capital through loans or
additional investments from our sponsor, members of our management team or their
affiliates, but such persons are not under any obligation to advance funds to,
or invest in, us.

We will enter into an Administrative Services Agreement pursuant to which we
will pay an affiliate of our sponsor a total of $10,000 per month for office
space, utilities and secretarial support beginning with the closing of this
offering. Upon completion of our initial business combination or our
liquidation, we will cease paying these monthly fees.

Prior to the closing of this offering, our sponsor may loan us up to an
aggregate of $150,000 to be used for a portion of the expenses of this offering.
These loans are non-interest bearing, unsecured and are due at the earlier of
December 31, 2016 or the closing of this offering. These loans will be repaid
upon the closing of this offering out of the $750,000 of offering proceeds that
has been allocated to the payment of offering expenses.

In addition, in order to finance transaction costs in connection with an
intended initial business combination, our sponsor or an affiliate of our
sponsor or certain of our officers and directors may, but are not obligated to,
loan us funds as may be required. If we complete our initial business
combination, we would repay such loaned amounts out of the proceeds of the trust
account released to us. Otherwise, such loans would be repaid only out of funds
held outside the trust account. In the event that our initial business
combination does not close, we may use a portion of the working capital held
outside the trust account to repay such loaned amounts but no proceeds from our
trust account would be used to repay such loaned amounts. Up to $1,500,000 of
such loans may be convertible into warrants of the post business combination
entity at a price of $1.00 per warrant at the option of the lender. The warrants
would be identical to the private placement warrants issued to our sponsor. The
terms of such loans by our officers and directors, if any, have not been
determined and no written agreements exist with respect to such loans. We do not
expect to seek loans from parties other than our sponsor or an affiliate of our
sponsor as we do not believe third parties will be willing to loan such funds
and provide a waiver against any and all rights to seek access to funds in our
trust account.

If we seek stockholder approval of our initial business combination and we do
not conduct redemptions in connection with our business combination pursuant to
the tender offer rules, our sponsor, directors, officers, advisors or their
affiliates may also purchase shares or public warrants in privately negotiated
transactions either prior to or following the completion of our initial business
combination. However, they have no current commitments, plans or intentions to
engage in such transactions and have not formulated any terms or conditions for
any such transactions. If they engage in such transactions, they will not make
any such purchases when they are in possession of any material non-public
information not disclosed to the seller or if such purchases are prohibited by
Regulation M under the Exchange Act. We do not currently anticipate that such
purchases, if any, would constitute a tender offer subject to the tender offer
rules under the Exchange Act or a going-private transaction subject to the
going-private rules under the Exchange Act; however, if the purchasers determine
at the time of any such purchases that the purchases are subject to such rules,
the purchasers will comply with such rules. Any such purchases will be reported
pursuant to Section 13 and Section 16 of the Exchange Act to the extent such
purchasers are subject to such reporting requirements. 

We may not redeem our public shares in an amount that would cause our net
tangible assets to be less than $5,000,001 (so that we are not subject to the
SEC’s “penny stock” rules) and the agreement for our business combination may
require as a closing condition that we have a minimum net worth or a certain
amount of cash. If too many public stockholders exercise their redemption rights
so that we cannot satisfy the net tangible asset requirement or any net worth or
cash requirements, we would not proceed with the redemption of our public shares
or the business combination, and instead may search for an alternate business
combination.

A public stockholder will be entitled to receive funds from the trust account
only upon the earlier to occur of: (i) the completion of our initial business
combination, (ii) the redemption of any public shares properly tendered in
connection with a stockholder vote to amend our amended and restated certificate
of incorporation to modify the substance or timing of our obligation to redeem
100% of our public shares if we do not complete our initial business combination
within 24 months from the closing of this offering and (iii) the redemption of
all of our public shares if we are unable to complete our business combination
within 24 months from the closing of this offering, subject to applicable law.
In no other circumstances will a public stockholder have any right or interest
of any kind to or in the trust account.

Our initial stockholder has entered into a letter agreement with us, pursuant to
which it has agreed to waive its redemption rights with respect to its founder
shares and public shares in connection with the completion of our initial
business combination. In addition, our initial stockholder has agreed to waive
its rights to liquidating distributions from the trust account with respect to
its founder shares if we fail to complete our business combination within the
prescribed time frame. However, if our sponsor or any of our officers, directors
or affiliates acquires public shares in or after this offering, they will be
entitled to liquidating distributions from the trust account with respect to
such public shares if we fail to complete our initial business combination
within the prescribed time frame.


In identifying, evaluating and selecting a target business for our business
combination, we may encounter intense competition from other entities having a
business objective similar to ours, including other blank check companies,
private equity groups and leveraged buyout funds, and operating businesses
seeking strategic acquisitions. Many of these entities are well established and
have extensive experience identifying and effecting business combinations
directly or through affiliates. Moreover, many of these competitors possess
greater financial, technical, human and other resources than us. Our ability to
acquire larger target businesses will be limited by our available financial
resources. This inherent limitation gives others an advantage in pursuing the
acquisition of a target business. Furthermore, our obligation to pay cash in
connection with our public stockholders who exercise their redemption rights may
reduce the resources available to us for our initial business combination and
our outstanding warrants, and the future dilution they potentially represent,
may not be viewed favorably by certain target businesses. Either of these
factors may place us at a competitive disadvantage in successfully negotiating
an initial business combination.


Company Description
We are a newly organized blank check company incorporated on May 9, 2016 as a
Delaware corporation and formed for the purpose of effecting a merger, capital
stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization or similar
business combination with one or more businesses. We refer to


 such a business
combination throughout this prospectus as our initial business combination. To
date, our efforts have been limited to organizational activities as well as
activities related to this offering. We have not identified any acquisition
target. We have not, nor has anyone on our behalf, initiated any discussions,
directly or indirectly, with respect to identifying any acquisition target. We
have generated no operating revenues to date and we do not expect that we will
generate operating revenues until we consummate our initial business
combination.

We currently intend to concentrate our efforts in identifying businesses which
provide services to the healthcare industry, with particular emphasis on
businesses that align with several key themes: the aging of America and the
growing need for better, more efficient care for the elderly; the shift from
fee-for-service to value based care payment models; and the increasing
importance and involvement of consumers in healthcare. We are not, however,
required to complete our initial business combination with a healthcare services
business and, as a result, we may pursue a business combination outside of that
industry. We will seek to acquire established businesses that we believe are
fundamentally sound but potentially in need of financial, operational, strategic
or managerial redirection to maximize value. We do not intend to acquire
start-up companies or companies that are not profitable.
---

Our executive offices are located at 595 East Lancaster Avenue, Suite 300,
Radnor, PA 19087 and our telephone number is (610) 229-9070.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
 -- 


Net Income
-$4,048


Total Assets
$380,068






Total Liabilities
$359,116


Stockholders' Equity
$20,952


View all Company Financials for IGLEU


Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 3 Total: 3
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



EAGLELINE ACQUISITION CORP.
S-1/A
11/15/2016
Filing



EAGLELINE ACQUISITION CORP.
S-1/A
10/28/2016
Filing



EAGLELINE ACQUISITION CORP.
S-1
10/14/2016
Filing



View all SEC Filings for IGLEU




Experts


Auditor
Marcum LLP


Company Counsel
Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP


Lead Underwriter
FBR Capital Markets & Co


Lead Underwriter
Stephens Inc.


Lead Underwriter
Stifel Nicolaus & Company, Incorporated


Transfer Agent
Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company


Underwriter Counsel
Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP









News for IGLEU









                        US IPO Week Ahead: The first REIT play on the cannabis market
                    

11/18/2016 5:58:17 PM - Renaissance Capital



                        Blank check for health care: Eagle Acquisition files for a $150 million IPO
                    

10/14/2016 8:49:18 AM - Renaissance Capital




 Subscribe


                More IGLEU News & Commentary



                Read IGLEU Press Releases

















Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6362.38


-19.81
 ▼ 
0.31%





DJIA

21779.25


-17.30
 ▼ 
0.08%





S&P 500

2467.97


-7.45
 ▼ 
0.30%










Data as of Jul 28, 2017 | 11:29AM


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Windstream completes acquisition of Broadview Networks
                        



	                    11:21AM ET  - GlobeNewswire
	                




                            Industrea Acquisition Corp. (Nasdaq: INDUU) to Ring The Nasdaq Stock Market Closing Bell
                        



	                    11:18AM ET  - GlobeNewswire
	                




                            Myriad to Announce Fiscal Fourth-Quarter 2017 Financial Results on August 8, 2017
                        



	                    11:16AM ET  - GlobeNewswire
	                




                            Republican effort to gut Obamacare crashes in U.S. Senate
                        



	                    10:55AM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX







































Eagleline Acquisition Corp: Company Profile - Bloomberg




































































  









Feedback















eagleline acquisition corp
Public Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Specialty Finance
Sub-Industry: Other Financial Services
Eagleline Acquisition Corp. provides financial services. The Company offers services such as capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, and reorganization. Eagle Acquisition conducts its business globally.




Corporate Information
Address:

595 East Lancaster Avenue
Suite 300
Radnor, PA 19087
United States


Phone:
1-610-229-9070


Fax:
1-610-964-7609





Board Members




Chairman
Company


Arnold Whitman
Formation Capital LLC








Chief Executive Officer
Company


Steven Fishman
Formation Capital LLC








President
Company


Joseph Fox
Eagleline Acquisition Corp








Board Members
Company


William Mathies
Consulate Health Care LLC




Rodney Windley
Pediatric Services of America Inc/GA


Russell Hirsch
Prospect Venture Partners




Show More
























From The Web











Key Executives


Steven Fishman "Steve"


Chief Executive Officer




Joseph L Fox


President







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data






































Eagleline Acquisition  - Verify.Wiki, the verified encyclopedia






















Eagleline Acquisition 
Follow Verify  
From Verify.Wiki


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



 


 [1]


 Eagleline Acquisition Corp.


 Type

 Public


 Industry

 Special Purpose Acquisition Company Blank-Check Company


 Founded

 2016


 Slogan

 Steven Fishman(CEO)


 Headquarters

 Radnor, Pennsylvania


 Key people

 Steven Fishman(CEO), Joseph L. Fox(President & Director)[1][2]


 Investors

 Eagle Acquisition Sponsor, LLC[3]


 Number of employees

 2


Eagleline Acquisition Corp. is a newly organized blank check company incorporated on May 9, 2016 as a Delaware corporation and formed for the purpose of effecting a merger, capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization or similarbusiness combination with one or more businesses, which provide services to the healthcare industry, with particular emphasis on businesses that align with several key themes: the aging of America and the growing need for better, more efficient care for the elderly; the shift from fee-for-service to value based care payment models; and the increasing importance and involvement of consumers in healthcare. The company seek to acquire established businesses that they believe are fundamentally sound but potentially in need of financial, operational, strategic or managerial redirection to maximize value.[4]


Contents

1 History
2 Controversies
3 Top 5 Recent Tweets
4 Top Recent News Headlines
5 Top 5 Lifetime Tweets
6 Top 5 Lifetime News Headlines


History
 October 14, 2016, Eagle Acquisition Corp. files for IPO of up to $150 mln.[5][6][7]
Controversies
None Reported.

Top 5 Recent Tweets


Top Recent News Headlines
Blank check for health care: Eagle Acquisition files for a $150 million IPO - The Radnor, PA-based company plans to raise $150 million by offering 15 million units at a price range of $10. At that price, Eagle Acquisition would command a fully diluted market value of $188 million. [8]
Top 5 Lifetime Tweets
Top 5 Lifetime News Headlines
↑ http://www.bloomberg.com/research/stocks/private/person.asp?personId=9317226&privcapId=404772071

↑ http://www.bloomberg.com/research/stocks/private/person.asp?personId=43567875

↑ https://www.lawinsider.com/contracts/11t1KIl0ffUCfZRZRnrDAB/eagle-acquisition-corp/1675776/2016-10-28

↑ http://www.nasdaq.com/markets/ipos/company/eagleline-acquisition-corp-1006023-81900

↑ http://www.nasdaq.com/article/blank-check-for-health-care-eagle-acquisition-files-for-a-150-million-ipo-cm693338

↑ http://in.reuters.com/article/idINFWN1CK09J?type=companyNews

↑ https://www.sec.gov/Archives/edgar/data/1675776/000161577416007619/0001615774-16-007619-index.htm

↑  http://www.nasdaq.com/article/blank-check-for-health-care-eagle-acquisition-files-for-a-150-million-ipo-cm693338#ixzz4P7U60px7 





Top Authors Atulya Bhatt Archana SinhaView all authorsVerification history 265 days agoView all verifications 
						Retrieved from "http://verify.wiki/w/index.php?title=Eagleline_Acquisition&oldid=7625"					
 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Create accountLog inCreate page 



Namespaces

Page
Discussion




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Getting startedFREE certificationsBusiness Applications 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesSpecial pagesPrintable versionPermanent linkPage information 






 This page was last modified on 5 November 2016, at 08:08.


Privacy policy
About Verify.Wiki
Contact us
Mobile view



 











Russell Hirsch - Limited Partner at Lead Edge Capital Management LLC



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Russell Hirsch
Limited Partner at Lead Edge Capital Management LLC



Overview
Relationships Paths
Education Career History Boards & Committees Political Donations Investments 


Russell Hirsch
Limited Partner at Lead Edge Capital Management LLC



 Overview



Age



55
                                  (Born 1962)
                                              




Board Seats



23





Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 917 people.
              






 Relationships
              See Details




William E. Cohn

Co-Founder at SentreHEART, Inc.




Russell Seiber

Founder at SentreHEART, Inc.





James Shapiro

Managing Director at Kearny Venture Partners




Grant A. Heidrich III

Former Managing Director, Mayfield Funds IV-X at Mayfield Fund LLC





Yogen Dalal

Founding Member at Claris Corp.




Uday N. Kumar

Founder at Element Science, Inc.





Mark Stautberg

Former Senior Vice President of Sales at Boston Scientific Corporation




Mark Levin

Partner at Third Rock Ventures LLC





Nicholas Galakatos

Co-Founder at Clarus Ventures LLC




Frederic H. Moll

Chief Executive Officer & Director at Auris Surgical Robotics, Inc.







See 907 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 907 More 


 


 Paths to Russell Hirsch



            Russell Hirsch          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Russell Hirsch






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Russell Hirsch.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



BA in Chemistry 


The University of Chicago

                  The University of Chicago's Office of Investments (COI) is responsible for managing the University's investment assets, which includes overseeing the endowment to ensure that it benefits both current and future generations of the University of Chicago. COI oversees the broad investment strategy and provides input to the development of the strategic and tactical investment policies of the University & UCMC endowments, pension plans and self-insurance trust assets. Their strategy combines qualitative and quantitative analysis, seeking to achieve superior investment performance on a risk-adjusted basis. COI's approach seeks to evaluate the investment strategy as an integrated part of the operating plans of the University rather than in isolation and focuses the the University's overall success, not investment returns. The endowment is well-diversified across a variety of asset classes, including global stocks and bonds, real estate, natural resources, private equity, absolute return strategies and protection (tail-hedging strategies). Asset class exposure is achieved primarily by selecting and engaging external managers. COI manages the global macro and the overlay portfolio to ensure that the portfolio’s overall positioning is compliance with the endowment's investment guidelines. COI's strategies for investing in the public markets include: Absolute Return, Private Debt, Fixed Income and Credit. and Global Equities. COI's real assets team invests globally in real estate and natural resources using outside managers. The real estate portfolio invests globally in value-added and opportunistic strategies using both private partnerships and public vehicles. The natural resources portfolio invests globally in strategies that include, but are not limited to: oil and gas exploration & production; power generation; infrastructure; timber; mining and minerals; and agriculture.                




Ph.D. in Biochemistry 


University of California - San Francisco

                  The University of California, San Francisco (UCSF), is a center of health sciences research, patient care, and education; located in San Francisco, California. UCSF is widely regarded as one of the world's leading universities in health sciences. Though one of the 10 campuses of the University of California, it is unique for being the only University of California campus dedicated solely to graduate education, and in health and biomedical sciences. Some of UCSF's treatment centers include kidney transplants and liver transplantation, radiology, neurosurgery, neurology, oncology, ophthalmology, gene therapy, women's health, fetal surgery, pediatrics, and internal medicine.                




MD in Biochemistry 


UCSF School of Medicine







 Career History



Partner

                                    2001 - Current                


Prospect Venture Partners


                  Prospect Venture Partners focuses on investments in commercially attractive biomedical technology and life science companies that have outstanding management teams, proprietary products and innovative technology or services. They participate in new company incubations, first and second venture financing rounds and expansion capital financings of later-stage private and public companies with proven business models. Initial investments range from $500,000 to $10 million with $10 million to $20 million invested over the life of a company. Prospect Venture Partners will serve as a lead investor or as a co-lead in a syndicate. The firm typically takes a seat on the boards of their portfolio companies.                




Limited Partner

                                    Current                


Lead Edge Capital Management LLC


                  Lead Edge Capital seeks to invest in expansion-stage technology companies that are interested in leveraging the company's vast network of corporate executives, successful entrepreneurs and investment professionals to drive sales and facilitate partnerships with the larger business community.

Lead Edge Capital targets rapidly growing companies worldwide within a variety of sectors, including, but not limited to, software, internet services, e-commerce and digital media.                




Managing Director

                                    Current                


Prospect Management Co. III LLC






Associate

                                    Tenure Unconfirmed                


Takeda Oncology Co.


                  Takeda Oncology Co. operates as a biopharmaceutical company. Its products include Ninlaro and Velcade. The company was founded in 1993 and is headquartered in Cambridge, MA.                




General Partner

                                    1992 - 2000                


Mayfield Fund LLC


                  Mayfield Fund invests globally in the consumer, enterprise, energy technology, communication service providers and semiconductors, chips and components sectors. They focus on the consumer, enterprise and service provider segments. The firm invests in next-generation information technology companies that are delivering innovative technology and breakthrough business models.Within the consumer sector, Mayfield Fund targets companies that offer consumers new ways to become more productive, informed and connected. Their enterprise investments focus on online marketing/advertising, business application, infrastructure, software and equipment companies. Within the energy technology sector, the firm looks for opportunities in energy efficiency, management and clean technology. Mayfield Fund focuses on investments in communications service providers that emphasize carriers' software and equipment needs. Their investments in the semiconductor, chips and components sector include communications and application-specific devices that reducethe cost of industrial, communications and consumer products.Mayfield Fund makes seed stage, early-stage and growth stage investments. They are also interested in making direct investments in China and India.                




Employee, Biomedical Research

                                    1984 - 1992                


University of California - San Francisco


                  The University of California, San Francisco (UCSF), is a center of health sciences research, patient care, and education; located in San Francisco, California. UCSF is widely regarded as one of the world's leading universities in health sciences. Though one of the 10 campuses of the University of California, it is unique for being the only University of California campus dedicated solely to graduate education, and in health and biomedical sciences. Some of UCSF's treatment centers include kidney transplants and liver transplantation, radiology, neurosurgery, neurology, oncology, ophthalmology, gene therapy, women's health, fetal surgery, pediatrics, and internal medicine.                




Promoter

                                    Prior                


SentreHEART, Inc.


                  SentreHEART, Inc. develops catheter based solutions. Its products include products include LARIAT Suture Delivery Device, a solution for soft tissue closure; EndoCATH Occlusion Balloon, a technology for temporary occlusion and angiography; and FindrWIRZ Magnetic Guide Wire System, a solution for diagnostic and interventional procedures where control of placement and delivery is required. The company was founded by Russell Seiber, John Randall Liddicoat and William E. Cohn in 2005 and is headquartered in Redwood City, CA.                





 Boards & Committees



Corporate Boards ▾




Director

                    2016 - Current                  


Eagleline Acquisition Corp.

                    Eagleline Acquisition Corp. operates as a blank check company with the purpose of effecting a merger, capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization, or similar business combination with one or more businesses. It intends to focus on businesses which provide services to the healthcare industry in the United States or globally. The company was founded on May 9, 2016 and is headquartered in Radnor, PA.                  




Vice Chairman, Board of Directors

                    Current                  


Interplastic Corp.

                    Interplastic Corp. manufactures unsaturated polyester, vinyl ester and specialty resins, gel coats, colorants and putties under the CoREZYN, Silmar and Integrity brand names for the composites, cast polymer, and solid surface industries. The company was founded in 1959 and is headquartered in St. Paul, MN.                  




Member, Board of Directors

                    Current                  


NinePoint Medical, Inc.

                    NinePoint Medical, Inc. develops and manufactures medical devices. It operates as a medical device company that designs, manufactures, and sells an Optical Coherence Tomography (OCT) imaging platform for clinical use in gastroenterology, pulmonology, urology, gynecology, and ENT, for the evaluation of human tissue microstructure. The firm’s NvisionVLE Imaging System is an imaging tool, which provides two-dimensional, cross-sectional and real-time depth visualization. The company was founded in 2008 and is headquartered in Bedford, MA.                  




Director

                    Current                  


Glooko, Inc.

                    Glooko, Inc. provides mobile diabetes management solution for patients, health systems, and payer groups. It enhances the way diabetics and care providers interact by leveraging the power of mobile, cloud, and analytics to transform diabetes management. The company was founded by Yogen K. Dalal, Chamath Palipitiya, Sundeep Madra, and Anita Matthew in June 2010 and is headquartered in Mountain View, CA.                  




Director

                    Current                  


DFine, Inc.

                    DFINE, Inc. develops and commercializes medical device system for treating vertebral compression fractures. The firm is the developer of Radiofrequency-Targeted Vertebral Augmentation, a novel approach to stabilizing vertebral compression fractures, relieving pain and improving patient mobility and provides physicians greater control in the treatment of vertebral compression fractures through site- and size-specific cavity creation, ultra-high viscosity bone cement with extended working time, and a unique, remotely controlled cement delivery system. The company was founded by John H. Shadduck and Csaba Truckai in 2004 and is headquartered in San Jose, CA.                  




Member, Board of Directors

                    Current                  


SentreHEART, Inc.

                    SentreHEART, Inc. develops catheter based solutions. Its products include products include LARIAT Suture Delivery Device, a solution for soft tissue closure; EndoCATH Occlusion Balloon, a technology for temporary occlusion and angiography; and FindrWIRZ Magnetic Guide Wire System, a solution for diagnostic and interventional procedures where control of placement and delivery is required. The company was founded by Russell Seiber, John Randall Liddicoat and William E. Cohn in 2005 and is headquartered in Redwood City, CA.                  




Member, Board of Directors

                    Current                  


Element Science, Inc.






Director

                    Prior - 2013                  


Baxano, Inc.

                    Baxano, Inc., based in San Jose, California, is focused on developing minimally invasive tools to restore spine function and preserve healthy tissue. Baxano is a well funded, privately held company which was founded in 2005 by Jeffery Bleich, M.D., who had the vision to create flexible tools to provide precision lumbar decompression from the 'inside out.'Baxano's mission is to develop innovative tools that restore spine function, preserve healthy tissue, and enable a better quality of life for the patients it serves.Along with its dedication to advanced technology development, Baxano is focused on providing exceptional value to patients, customers, investors and employees.                  




Independent Director

                    2013 - 2014                  


Baxano Surgical, Inc.

                    Baxano Surgical, Inc. operates as a medical device company, that focuses on designing, developing, and marketing minimally invasive products to treat degenerative conditions of the spine affecting the lumbar region.. The company was founded in May 2000 and is headquartered in Raleigh, NC.                  




Director

                    2003 - 2009                  


Visiogen, Inc.

                    Visiogen, Inc. develops products for cataract and refractive patients. It offers synchrony dual-optic accommodating intraocular lens and pre-loaded injector, which provide distance, intermediate, and near vision to presbyopic cataract patients. The company was founded on March 19, 2001 and is headquartered in Abbott Park, IL.                  




Independent Director

                    2003 - 2013                  


Portola Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

                    Portola Pharmaceuticals, Inc. engages in the development and commercialization of novel therapeutics in the areas of thrombosis and other hematologic disorders, and inflammation. Its development-stage portfolio consists of the compounds including Betrixaban, a novel oral once-daily inhibitor of Factor Xa in phase three clinical trials for extended duration prophylaxis, or preventive treatment of a form of thrombosis known as venous thromboembolism, in acute medically ill patients; Andexanet alfa, a recombinant protein designed to reverse anticoagulant activity in patients treated with a Factor Xa inhibitor; and Cerdulatinib, an orally available kinase inhibitor that inhibits spleen tyrosine kinase and janus kinases, enzymes that regulate important signaling pathways. The company was founded by Charles J. Homcy and David R. Philips on September 2, 2003 and is headquartered in South San Francisco, CA.                  




Independent Director

                    2002 - 2011                  


AVEO Pharmaceuticals Inc.

                    AVEO Pharmaceuticals, Inc. operates as a biopharmaceutical company, which engages in the advancement of therapeutics for oncology and other areas of unmet medical need. Its products include Tivozanib, Ficlatuzmab, AV-203, AV-380, and AV-353. It focuses on the development of its lead candidate, Tivozanib, in North America as a treatment for renal cell carcinoma and other cancers. The company was founded by Ronald A. DePinho, Lynda Chin, and Kenneth E. Weg on October 19, 2001 and is headquartered in Cambridge, MA.                  




Independent Lead Director

                    2002 - 2012                  


Hansen Medical, Inc.

                    Hansen Medical, Inc. develops, manufactures and sells a new generation of medical robotics designed for positioning, manipulation and stable control of catheters and catheter-based technologies. The firm's Sensei Robotic Catheter System is designed to allow physicians to instinctively navigate flexible catheters with stability and control in interventional procedures within the atria heart chambers. The company was founded by Frederic H. Moll, Daniel T. Wallace, Marvin J. Slepian and Robert G. Younge on September 23, 2002 and is headquartered in Redwood, CA.                  




Director

                    1998 - 2006                  


Sunesis Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

                    Sunesis Pharmaceuticals, Inc. engages in the development and commercialization of new oncology therapeutics for the treatment of solid and hematologic cancers. Its efforts are currently focused primarily on the development of vosaroxin for the treatment of acute myeloid leukemia. The firms activities include conducting research and development internally and through corporate collaborators, in-licensing and out-licensing pharmaceutical compounds and technology, conducting clinical trials and raising capital. The company was founded on February 10, 1998 and is headquartered in South San Francisco, CA.                  




Director

                    1995 - Prior                  


Intuitive Surgical, Inc.

                    Intuitive Surgical, Inc. engages in the development, manufacture, and marketing of da Vinci Surgical Systems, and related instruments and accessories for invasive surgery. The company was founded by Frederic H. Moll, John Gordon Freund, and Robert G. Younge in November 1995 and is headquartered in Sunnyvale, CA.                  




Director

                    Prior                  


TranS1, Inc.

                    TranS1, Inc. designs and develops surgical procedures and equipment for back pain. It is a medical device company focused on designing, developing and marketing products that implement its proprietary approach to treat degenerative conditions of the spine affecting the lower lumbar region. TranS1 currently markets the AxiaLIF family of products for single-level and two-level lumbar fusion and the Vectre and Avatar posterior fixation systems for lumbar fixation supplemental to AxiaLIF fusion. Its primary technology is AxiaLIF, a minimally invasive access and fusion system that enables lumbar fusion to be performed with complete preservation of the annulus and all paraspinal soft tissue structures. The company specializes in bringing innovative spine solutions to market, including AxiaLIF and AxiaLIF 2L+, technologies that allow surgeons to perform lower lumbar fusions that result in high fusion rates and low complication rates. The company is also developing a motion preservation platform to be delivered through this minimally invasive, trans-sacral approach. TranS1 was founded in May 2000 and is headquartered in Wilmington, NC.                  




Director

                    Prior                  


Topica Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

                    Topica Pharmaceuticals, Inc. develops treatment for onychomycosis, or fungal infections of the nail and nail bed. Its prodycte, Luliconazole, a topical antifungal a topical antifungal agent used to tinea pedis. The company was founded in 2004 and is headquartered Los Altos, CA.                  




Director

                    Prior                  


Cabochon Aesthetics, Inc.

                    Cabochon Aesthetics, Inc. offers scientific solutions for aesthetic procedures. Its also provides noninvasive fat removal and cellulite treatment. The company was founded on January 12, 2005 and is headquartered in Menlo Park, CA.                  




Director

                    Prior                  


Opus Medical, Inc.

                    Opus Medical, Inc. used to develop, manufacture and market innovative soft tissue-to-bone and tissue-to-tissue repair systems for orthopedic applications. The company was founded in 1999 and was headquartered in San Juan Capistrano, CA.                  




Advisor

                    Prior                  


Rembrandt Venture Management LLC

                    Rembrandt Venture Management (RVM) focuses on private equity investments in early-stage technology companies across a variety of sectors including Internet infrastructure, application software delivered as a service, communications, next generation wireless and new media convergence. The firm invests primarily in companies located in the companies in Silicon Valley region of the US.                  




Director

                    Prior                  


Allux Medical, Inc.

                    Allux Medical, Inc., a medical device company, develops devices to locally modulate the immune system for the treatment of inflammatory diseases. The company was founded in 2004 by a medical doctor Michael Gertner and a serial entrepreneur Erica Rogers and is based in Menlo Park, California.                  




Director

                    Prior                  


Orquest, Inc.

                    Orquest, Inc. developed and manufactured bone graft materials. Its technology  HEALOS Bone Graft Material, was designed and developed to reduce the time and pain associated with standard bone graft harvesting. Orquest was located in Mountain View, CA.                  




Non-Profit Boards ▾




Board Member

                    Tenure Unconfirmed                  


ReSurge International

                    PROVIDE RECONSTRUCTIVE SURGERY IN DEVELOPING COUNTRIES; BUILD SURGICAL CAPACITY.                  





 Political Donations



$250

                  2012                


Orrin Grant Hatch


                  President Pro Tempore at Office of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Orrin Hatch                




$250

                  2011                


Elizabeth Esty


                  Representative from Connecticut's 5th Congressional District                




$1,000

                  2010                


VenturePAC







$1,071

                  2009                


VenturePAC







$937

                  2007                


VenturePAC









See 5 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 5 More 






 Investments



 Details Hidden


Glooko, Inc.

                  Glooko, Inc. provides mobile diabetes management solution for patients, health systems, and payer groups. It enhances the way diabetics and care providers interact by leveraging the power of mobile, cloud, and analytics to transform diabetes management. The company was founded by Yogen K. Dalal, Chamath Palipitiya, Sundeep Madra, and Anita Matthew in June 2010 and is headquartered in Mountain View, CA.                




 Details Hidden


Gauss Surgical, Inc.

                  Gauss Surgical, Inc. engages in mobile health operation which specializes in blood and hemoglobin loss monitoring during surgery. Its services include research and development, publications, clinical performance, feature extraction technology, rapid integration with surgical workflow, and inoperative mobile platform. The company was founded by Siddarth Satish in 2011 and is headquartered in Los Altos, CA.                





 Other Affiliations




              Russell Hirsch is affiliated with
                            Prospect Venture Partners, Lead Edge Capital Management LLC, Prospect Management Co. III LLC, Takeda Oncology Co., Mayfield Fund LLC, University of California - San Francisco, SentreHEART, Inc., Eagleline Acquisition Corp., Interplastic Corp., NinePoint Medical, Inc., Glooko, Inc., DFine, Inc., SentreHEART, Inc., Element Science, Inc., Baxano, Inc., Baxano Surgical, Inc., Visiogen, Inc., Portola Pharmaceuticals, Inc., AVEO Pharmaceuticals Inc., Hansen Medical, Inc., Sunesis Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Intuitive Surgical, Inc., TranS1, Inc., Topica Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Cabochon Aesthetics, Inc., Opus Medical, Inc., Rembrandt Venture Management LLC, Allux Medical, Inc., Orquest, Inc., ReSurge International.
            





You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤
























Eagleline Acquisition Corp. Competitors - NASDAQ.com

































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search
























Home > 
    Quotes > 
    IGLEU > 
    Competitors





 











IGLEU





 










 







Edit Symbol List




Symbol Lookup























Real Time
NLS Trade Reporting
FlashQuotes
InfoQuotes
Summary Quote
Charts
Interactive Charts
Pre-Market Charts
After Hours Charts
Revenue / EPS Summary
Company Financials
- View Competitors
- Short Interest
Company News
Press Releases
Company News
Press Releases
Sentiment
Analyst Stock Research
Stock Report
SEC Filings
- Holdings/Insider Summary
- Institutional Holdings
- Insider Form 4

Equity Options
Pre-Market Quotes
After Hours Quotes
Company Research
- StockConsultant
Stock Comparison
- Guru Analysis
Annual Report
Historical Quotes
Call Transcripts
Dividend History
Lynch Analysis
Graham Analysis
Validea Momentum Analysis
Fool Analysis
Dreman Analysis
Zweig Analysis
Fisher Analysis
OShaughnessy Analysis
ETF detail
ETF Profile
Comparison Charts



Symbol List Views
FlashQuotes
InfoQuotes
 
                    Stock Details
           
        
Summary Quote
Real-Time Quote
After Hours Quote
Pre-market Quote
Historical Quote
Option Chain
CHARTS
Basic Chart
Interactive Chart

		        
    
                COMPANY NEWS
Company Headlines
Press Releases
Market Stream
STOCK ANALYSIS
Analyst Research
Guru Analysis
Stock Report
Competitors
Stock Consultant
Stock Comparison
FUNDAMENTALS
Call Transcripts
Annual Report
Income Statement
Revenue/EPS
SEC Filings
Short Interest
Dividend History
HOLDINGS
Ownership Summary
Institutional Holdings
Insiders(SEC Form 4)






CLOSEX


Edit Symbol List



Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.








Go Now

Clear List






            Don't know the stock symbol?  Use the 
            Symbol Lookup tool.
	        
Alphabetize the sort order of my symbols
		






CLOSEX


 
Symbol Lookup











CLOSEX
Investing just got easier…
Sign up now to become a NASDAQ.com member and begin receiving instant notifications when key events occur that affect the stocks you follow.

Access Now











 Save Stocks

























Eagleline Acquisition Corp.






































CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX


















































































Indemnity Agreement - Indemnification Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Indemnification Agreement     > INDEMNITY AGREEMENT

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Indemnity Agreement
Indemnification Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Indemnification Agreement involves EAGLELINE ACQUISITION CORP. | EAGLE ACQUISITION CORP. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: INDEMNITY AGREEMENT Governing Law: Delaware      Date: 10/14/2016 Law Firm: Skadden Arps      









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day









 
Exhibit 10.7

 

INDEMNITY
AGREEMENT

 

THIS INDEMNITY
AGREEMENT (this “
Agreement ”) is made as of [●], 2016, by
and between EAGLE ACQUISITION CORP., a Delaware corporation (the
“ Company ”), and [●] (“
Indemnitee ”).

 

RECITALS

 

WHEREAS , highly competent persons have become more
reluctant to serve publicly-held corporations as directors,
officers or in other capacities unless they are provided with
adequate protection through insurance or adequate indemnification
against inordinate risks of claims and actions against them arising
out of their service to and activities on behalf of such
corporations;

 

WHEREAS , the Board of Directors of the Company (the
“ Board ”) has determined that, in order
to attract and retain qualified individuals, the Company will
attempt to maintain on an ongoing basis, at its sole expense,
liability insurance to protect persons serving the Company and any
of its subsidiaries from certain liabilities. Although the
furnishing of such insurance has been a customary and widespread
practice among publicly traded corporations and other business
enterprises, the Company believes that, given current market
conditions and trends, such insurance may be available to it in the
future only at higher premiums and with more exclusions. At the
same time, directors, officers and other persons in service to
corporations or business enterprises are being increasingly
subjected to expensive and time-consuming litigation relating to,
among other things, matters that traditionally would have been
brought only against the Company or business enterprise itself. The
Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation (the “
Charter ”) and Bylaws of the Company require
indemnification of the officers and directors of the Company.
Indemnitee may also be entitled to indemnification pursuant to
applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law
(“ DGCL ”). The Charter, the
Company’s Bylaws and the DGCL expressly provide that the
indemnification provisions set forth therein are not exclusive, and
thereby contemplate that contracts may be entered into between the
Company and members of the board of directors, officers and other
persons with respect to indemnification, hold harmless,
exoneration, advancement and reimbursement rights; 

 

WHEREAS , the uncertainties relating to such insurance
and to indemnification have increased the difficulty of attracting
and retaining such persons;

 

WHEREAS , the Board has determined that the increased
difficulty in attracting and retaining such persons is detrimental
to the best interests of the Company’s stockholders and that
the Company should act to assure such persons that there will be
increased certainty of such protection in the future;

 

WHEREAS , it is reasonable, prudent and necessary for
the Company contractually to obligate itself to indemnify, hold
harmless, exonerate and to advance expenses on behalf of, such
persons to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law so that
they will serve or continue to serve the Company free from undue
concern that they will not be so protected against
liabilities;

 

WHEREAS , this Agreement is a supplement to and in
furtherance of the Charter and Bylaws of the Company and any
resolutions adopted pursuant thereto, and shall not be deemed a
substitute therefor, nor to diminish or abrogate any rights of
Indemnitee thereunder;

 

WHEREAS , Indemnitee may not be willing to serve as an
officer or director, advisor or in another capacity without
adequate protection, and the Company desires Indemnitee to serve in
such capacity. Indemnitee is willing to serve, continue to serve
and to take on additional service for or on behalf of the Company
on the condition that he be so indemnified; and

 

NOW, THEREFORE
, in consideration of the premises
and the covenants contained herein and subject to the provisions of
the letter agreement dated as of [●], 2016 between the
Company and Indemnitee pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement
between the Company and the Underwriters in connection with the
Company’s initial public offering, the Company and Indemnitee
do hereby covenant and agree as follows:

 

 



 


 

TERMS AND
CONDITIONS

 




1.


SERVICES TO THE COMPANY. Indemnitee will serve or continue to serve as an
officer, director, advisor, key employee or in any other capacity
of the Company, as applicable, for so long as Indemnitee is duly
elected, appointed or retained or until Indemnitee tenders his
resignation.




 




2.


DEFINITIONS. As used in this Agreement:




 

2.1           References
to “ agent ” shall mean any person who is
or was a director, officer or employee of the Company or a
subsidiary of the Company or other person authorized by the Company
to act for the Company, to include such person serving in such
capacity as a director, officer, employee, advisor, fiduciary or
other official of another corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, joint venture, trust or other enterprise at the
request of, for the convenience of, or to represent the interests
of the Company or a subsidiary of the Company.

 

2.2           The
terms “ Beneficial Owner ” and “
Beneficial Ownership ” shall have the meanings
set forth in Rule 13d-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act (as
defined below) as in effect on the date hereof.

 

2.3           A
“ Change in Control ” shall be deemed to
occur upon the earliest to occur after the date of this Agreement
of any of the following events:

 

2.3.1           
Acquisition of Stock by Third Party . Other than an
affiliate of Eagle Acquisition Sponsor, LLC, any Person (as defined
below) is or becomes the Beneficial Owner, directly or indirectly,
of securities of the Company representing fifteen percent (15%) or
more of the combined voting power of the Company’s then
outstanding securities entitled to vote generally in the election
of directors, unless (1) the change in the relative Beneficial
Ownership of the Company’s securities by any Person results
solely from a reduction in the aggregate number of outstanding
shares of securities entitled to vote generally in the election of
directors, or (2) such acquisition was approved in advance by the
Continuing Directors (as defined below) and such acquisition would
not constitute a Change in Control under part 2.3.3 of this
definition;

 

2.3.2           
Change in Board of Directors . Individuals who, as of the
date hereof, constitute the Board, and any new director whose
election by the Board or nomination for election by the
Company’s stockholders was approved by a vote of at least two
thirds of the directors then still in office who were directors on
the date hereof or whose election for nomination for election was
previously so approved (collectively, the “ Continuing
Directors ”), cease for any reason to constitute at
least a majority of the members of the Board;

 

2.3.3           
Corporate Transactions . The effective date of a merger,
capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase,
reorganization or similar business combination, involving the
Company and one or more businesses (a “ Business
Combination ”), in each case, unless, following such
Business Combination: (1) all or substantially all of the
individuals and entities who were the Beneficial Owners of
securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors
immediately prior to such Business Combination beneficially own,
directly or indirectly, more than fifty-one Percent (51%) of the
combined voting power of the then outstanding securities of the
Company entitled to vote generally in the election of directors
resulting from such Business Combination (including, without
limitation, a corporation which as a result of such transaction
owns the Company or all or substantially all of the Company’s
assets either directly or through one or more Subsidiaries) in
substantially the same proportions as their ownership immediately
prior to such Business Combination, of the securities entitled to
vote generally in the election of directors; (2) other than an
affiliate of Eagle Acquisition Sponsor, LLC, no Person (excluding
any corporation resulting from such Business Combination) is the
Beneficial Owner, directly or indirectly, of fifteen percent (15%)
or more of the combined voting power of the then outstanding
securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors
of the surviving corporation except to the extent that such
ownership existed prior to the Business Combination; and (3) at
least a majority of the Board of Directors of the corporation
resulting from such Business Combination were Continuing Directors
at the time of the execution of the initial agreement, or of the
action of the Board of Directors, providing for such Business
Combination;

 

2.3.4           
Liquidation . The approval by the stockholders of the
Company of a complete liquidation of the Company or an agreement or
series of agreements for the sale or disposition by the Company of
all or substantially all of the Company’s assets, other than
factoring the Company’s current receivables or escrows due
(or, if such approval is not required, the decision by the Board to
proceed with such a liquidation, sale, or disposition in one
transaction or a series of related transactions); or

 




 



2



 






 


 

2.3.5           
Other Events . There occurs any other event of a nature that
would be required to be reported in response to Item 6(e) of
Schedule 14A of Regulation 14A (or a response to any similar item
on any similar schedule or form) promulgated under the Exchange
Act, whether or not the Company is then subject to such reporting
requirement.

 

2.4           “
Corporate Status ” describes the status of a
person who is or was a director, officer, trustee, general partner,
managing member, fiduciary, employee or agent of the Company or of
any other Enterprise (as defined below) which such person is or was
serving at the request of the Company.

 

2.5           “
Delaware Court ” shall mean the Court of
Chancery of the State of Delaware.

 

2.6           “
Disinterested Director ” shall mean a director
of the Company who is not and was not a party to the Proceeding (as
defined below) in respect of which indemnification is sought by
Indemnitee.

 

2.7           “
Enterprise ” shall mean the Company and any
other corporation, constituent corporation (including any
constituent of a constituent) absorbed in a consolidation or merger
to which the Company (or any of its wholly owned subsidiaries) is a
party, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture,
trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise of which
Indemnitee is or was serving at the request of the Company as a
director, officer, trustee, general partner, managing member,
fiduciary, employee or agent.

 

2.8           “
Exchange Act ” shall mean the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.

 

2.9           “
Expenses ” shall include all direct and
indirect costs, fees and expenses of any type or nature whatsoever,
including, without limitation, all attorneys’ fees and costs,
retainers, court costs, transcript costs, fees of experts, witness
fees, travel expenses, fees of private investigators and
professional advisors, duplicating costs, printing and binding
costs, telephone charges, postage, delivery service fees, fax
transmission charges, secretarial services and all other
disbursements, obligations or expenses in connection with
prosecuting, defending, preparing to prosecute or defend,
investigating, being or preparing to be a witness in, settlement or
appeal of, or otherwise participating in, a Proceeding, including
reasonable compensation for time spent by Indemnitee for which he
or she is not otherwise compensated by the Company or any third
party. Expenses also shall include Expenses incurred in connection
with any appeal resulting from any Proceeding, including without
limitation the principal, premium, security for, and other costs
relating to any cost bond, supersedeas bond, or other appeal bond
or its equivalent. Expenses, however, shall not include amounts
paid in settlement by Indemnitee or the amount of judgments or
fines against Indemnitee.

 

2.10         “
Independent Counsel ” shall mean a law firm or
a member of a law firm with significant experience in matters of
corporation law and neither presently is, nor in the past five (5)
years has been, retained to represent: (i) the Company or
Indemnitee in any matter material to either such party (other than
with respect to matters concerning Indemnitee under this Agreement,
or of other indemnitees under similar indemnification agreements);
or (ii) any other party to the Proceeding giving rise to a claim
for indemnification hereunder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the
term “ Independent Counsel ” shall not
include any person who, under the applicable standards of
professional conduct then prevailing, would have a conflict of
interest in representing either the Company or Indemnitee in an
action to determine Indemnitee’s rights under this
Agreement.

 

2.11         References
to “ fines ” shall include any excise tax
assessed on Indemnitee with respect to any employee benefit plan;
references to “serving at the request of the Company”
shall include any service as a director, officer, employee, agent
or fiduciary of the Company which imposes duties on, or involves
services by, such director, officer, employee, agent or fiduciary
with respect to an employee benefit plan, its participants or
beneficiaries; and if Indemnitee acted in good faith and in a
manner Indemnitee reasonably believed to be in the best interests
of the participants and beneficiaries of an employee benefit plan,
Indemnitee shall be deemed to have acted in a manner “not
opposed to the best interests of the Company” as referred to
in this Agreement.

 

2.12         The
term “ Person ” shall have the meaning as
set forth in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Exchange Act as in
effect on the date hereof; provided , however , that
“Person” shall exclude: (i) the Company; (ii) any
Subsidiaries (as defined below) of the Company; (iii) any
employment benefit plan of the Company or of a Subsidiary of the
Company or of any corporation owned, directly or indirectly, by the
stockholders of the Company in substantially the same proportions
as their ownership of stock of the Company; and (iv) any trustee or
other fiduciary holding securities under an employee benefit plan
of the Company or of a Subsidiary of the Company or of a
corporation owned directly or indirectly by the stockholders of the
Company in substantially the same proportions as their ownership of
stock of the Company.

 

2.13         The
term “ Proceeding ” shall include any
threatened, pending or completed action, suit, arbitration,
mediation, alternate dispute resolution mechanism, investigation,
inquiry, administrative hearing or any other actual, threatened or
completed proceeding, whether brought in the right of the Company
or otherwise and whether of a civil (including intentional or
unintentional tort claims), criminal, administrative, or
investigative or related nature, in which Indemnitee was, is, will
or might be involved as a party or otherwise by reason of the fact
that Indemnitee is or was a director or officer of the Company, by
reason of any action (or failure to act) taken by him or of any
action (or failure to act) on his part while acting as a director
or officer of the Company, or by reason of the fact that he is or
was serving at the request of the Company as a director, officer,
trustee, general partner, managing member, fiduciary, employee or
agent of any other Enterprise, in each case whether or not serving
in such capacity at the time any liability or expense is incurred
for which indemnification, reimbursement, or advancement of
expenses can be provided under this Agreement.

 




 



3



 






 


 

2.14         The
term “ Subsidiary ,” with respect to any
Person, shall mean any corporation or other entity of which a
majority of the voting power of the voting equity securities or
equity interest is owned, directly or indirectly, by that
Person.

 




3.


INDEMNITY IN THIRD-PARTY
PROCEEDINGS.




 
To the fullest extent permitted by applicable
law, the Company shall indemnify, hold harmless and exonerate
Indemnitee in accordance with the provisions of this Section
3 if Indemnitee was, is, or is threatened to be made, a party
to or a participant (as a witness or otherwise) in any Proceeding,
other than a Proceeding by or in the right of the Company to
procure a judgment in its favor. Pursuant to this Section 3
, Indemnitee shall be indemnified, held harmless and exonerated
against all Expenses, judgments, liabilities, fines, penalties and
amounts paid in settlement (including all interest, assessments and
other charges paid or payable in connection with or in respect of
such Expenses, judgments, fines, penalties and amounts paid in
settlement) actually and reasonably incurred by Indemnitee or on
his behalf in connection with such Proceeding or any claim, issue
or matter therein, if Indemnitee acted in good faith and in a
manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best
interests of the Company and, in the case of a criminal Proceeding,
had no reasonable cause to believe that his conduct was
unlawful.
 




4.


INDEMNITY IN PROCEEDINGS BY OR IN THE RIGHT OF
THE COMPANY.




 
To the fullest extent permitted by applicable
law, the Company shall indemnify, hold harmless and exonerate
Indemnitee in accordance with the provisions of this Section
4 if Indemnitee was, is, or is threatened to be made, a party
to or a participant (as a witness or otherwise) in any Proceeding
by or in the right of the Company to procure a judgment in its
favor. Pursuant to this Section 4 , Indemnitee shall be
indemnified, held harmless and exonerated against all Expenses
actually and reasonably incurred by him or on his behalf in
connection with such Proceeding or any claim, issue or matter
therein, if Indemnitee acted in good faith and in a manner he
reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests
of the Company. No indemnification, hold harmless or exoneration
for Expenses shall be made under this Section 4 in respect
of any claim, issue or matter as to which Indemnitee shall have
been finally adjudged by a court to be liable to the Company,
unless and only to the extent that any court in which the
Proceeding was brought or the Delaware Court shall determine upon
application that, despite the adjudication of liability but in view
of all the circumstances of the case, Indemnitee is fairly and
reasonably entitled to indemnification, to be held harmless or to
exoneration.
 




5.


INDEMNIFICATION FOR EXPENSES OF A PARTY WHO IS
WHOLLY OR PARTLY SUCCESSFUL.




 
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
Agreement except for Section 27 , to the extent that
Indemnitee is a party to (or a participant in) and is successful,
on the merits or otherwise, in any Proceeding or in defense of any
claim, issue or matter therein, in whole or in part, the Company
shall, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law,
indemnify, hold harmless and exonerate Indemnitee against all
Expenses actually and reasonably incurred by him in connection
therewith. If Indemnitee is not wholly successful in such
Proceeding but is successful, on the merits or otherwise, as to one
or more but less than all claims, issues or matters in such
Proceeding, the Company shall, to the fullest extent permitted by
applicable law, indemnify, hold harmless and exonerate Indemnitee
against all Expenses actually and reasonably incurred by him or on
his behalf in connection with each successfully resolved claim,
issue or matter. If Indemnitee is not wholly successful in such
Proceeding, the Company also shall, to the fullest extent permitted
by applicable law, indemnify, hold harmless and exonerate
Indemnitee against all Expenses reasonably incurred in connection
with a claim, issue or matter related to any claim, issue, or
matter on which Indemnitee was successful. For purposes of this
Section 5 and without limitation, the termination of any
claim, issue or matter in such a Proceeding by dismissal, with or
without prejudice, shall be deemed to be a successful result as to
such claim, issue or matter.
 




6.


INDEMNIFICATION FOR EXPENSES OF A
WITNESS.




 
Notwithstanding any other provision of this
Agreement except for Section 27 , to the extent that
Indemnitee is, by reason of his Corporate Status, a witness in any
Proceeding to which Indemnitee is not a party, he shall, to the
fullest extent permitted by applicable law, be indemnified, held
harmless and exonerated against all Expenses actually and
reasonably incurred by him or on his behalf in connection
therewith.
 




 



4



 






 


 




7.


ADDITIONAL INDEMNIFICATION, HOLD HARMLESS AND
EXONERATION RIGHTS.




 

7.1           Notwithstanding
any limitation in Sections 3 , 4, or 5, except for
Section 27 , the Company shall, to the fullest extent
permitted by applicable law, indemnify, hold harmless and exonerate
Indemnitee if Indemnitee is a party to or threatened to be made a
party to any Proceeding (including a Proceeding by or in the right
of the Company to procure a judgment in its favor) against all
Expenses, judgments, fines, penalties and amounts paid in
settlement (including all interest, assessments and other charges
paid or payable in connection with or in respect of such Expenses,
judgments, fines, penalties and amounts paid in settlement)
actually and reasonably incurred by Indemnitee in connection with
the Proceeding. No indemnification, hold harmless or exoneration
rights shall be available under this Section 7.1 on account
of Indemnitee’s conduct which constitutes a breach of
Indemnitee’s duty of loyalty to the Company or its
stockholders or is an act or omission not in good faith or which
involves intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of the
law.

 

7.2           Notwithstanding
any limitation in Sections 3 , 4, 5 or 7.1 , except
for Section 27 , the Company shall, to the fullest extent
permitted by applicable law, indemnify, hold harmless and exonerate
Indemnitee if Indemnitee is a party to or threatened to be made a
party to any Proceeding (including a Proceeding by or in the right
of the Company to procure a judgment in its favor) against all
Expenses, judgments, fines, penalties and amounts paid in
settlement (including all interest, assessments and other charges
paid or payable in connection with or in respect of such Expenses,
judgments, fines, penalties and amounts paid in settlement)
actually and reasonably incurred by Indemnitee in connection with
the Proceeding.

 




8.


CONTRIBUTION IN THE EVENT OF JOINT
LIABILITY.




 

8.1           To
the fullest extent permissible under applicable law, if the
indemnification, hold harmless and/or exoneration rights provided
for in this Agreement are unavailable to Indemnitee in whole or in
part for any reason whatsoever, the Company, in lieu of
indemnifying, holding harmless or exonerating Indemnitee, shall
pay, in the first instance, the entire amount incurred by
Indemnitee, whether for judgments, liabilities, fines, penalties,
amounts paid or to be paid in settlement and/or for Expenses, in
connection with any Proceeding without requiring Indemnitee to
contribute to such payment, and the Company hereby waives and
relinquishes any right of contribution it may have at any time
against Indemnitee.

 

8.2           The
Company shall not enter into any settlement of any Proceeding in
which the Company is jointly liable with Indemnitee (or would be if
joined in such Proceeding) unless such settlement provides for a
full and final release of all claims asserted against
Indemnitee.

 

8.3           The
Company hereby agrees to fully indemnify, hold harmless and
exonerate Indemnitee from any claims for contribution which may be
brought by officers, directors or employees of the Company other
than Indemnitee who may be jointly liable with
Indemnitee.

 




9.


EXCLUSIONS.




 
Notwithstanding any provision in this Agreement
except for Section 27 , the Company shall not be obligated
under this Agreement to make any indemnification, hold harmless or
exoneration payment in connection with any claim made against
Indemnitee:
 

(a)           for
which payment has actually been received by or on behalf of
Indemnitee under any insurance policy or other indemnity provision,
except with respect to any excess beyond the amount actually
received under any insurance policy, contract, agreement, other
indemnity provision or otherwise;

 

(b)           for
an accounting of profits made from the purchase and sale (or sale
and purchase) by Indemnitee of securities of the Company within the
meaning of Section 16(b) of the Exchange Act or similar provisions
of state statutory law or common law; or

 

(c)           except
as otherwise provided in Sections 14.5 and 14.6
hereof, prior to a Change in Control, in connection with any
Proceeding (or any part of any Proceeding) initiated by Indemnitee,
including any Proceeding (or any part of any Proceeding) initiated
by Indemnitee against the Company or its directors, officers,
employees or other indemnitees, unless (i) the Board authorized the
Proceeding (or any part of any Proceeding) prior to its initiation
or (ii) the Company provides the indemnification, hold harmless or
exoneration payment, in its sole discretion, pursuant to the powers
vested in the Company under applicable law.

 




 



5



 






 


 




10.


ADVANCES OF EXPENSES; DEFENSE OF
CLAIM.




 

10.1         Notwithstanding
any provision of this Agreement to the contrary except for
Section 27 , and to the fullest extent not prohibited by
applicable law, the Company shall pay the Expenses incurred by
Indemnitee (or reasonably expected by Indemnitee to be incurred by
Indemnitee within three (3) months) in connection with any
Proceeding within ten (10) days after the receipt by the Company of
a statement or statements requesting such advances from time to
time, prior to the final disposition of any Proceeding. Advances
shall be unsecured and interest free. Advances shall be made
without regard to Indemnitee’s ability to repay the Expenses
and without regard to Indemnitee’s ultimate entitlement to be
indemnified, held harmless or exonerated under the other provisions
of this Agreement. Advances shall include any and all reasonable
Expenses incurred pursuing a Proceeding to enforce this right of
advancement, including Expenses incurred preparing and forwarding
statements to the Company to support the advances claimed. To the
fullest extent required by applicable law, such payments of
Expenses in advance of the final disposition of the Proceeding
shall be made only upon the Company’s receipt of an
undertaking, by or on behalf of Indemnitee, to repay the advance to
the extent that it is ultimately determined that Indemnitee is not
entitled to be indemnified by the Company under the provisions of
this Agreement, the Charter, the Bylaws of the Company, applicable
law or otherwise. This Section 10.1 shall not apply to any
claim


 








 


















Warrant Agreement, Warrant Contracts - Free Legal Documents (page 1 Of 272)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Warrant Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>




 These are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. You can view sample warrant contracts or download warrant agreements from RealDealDocs. We have thousands of sample warrant agreements, and millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free. 

Finding relevant agreements to use in your own work no longer has to be difficult, confusing or expensive. The many sample warrant agreements from RealDealDocs have been drafted by top law firms from across the United States and around the world, and they can save you or your company valuable time and money when you need a reliable warrant contract or template in a hurry. Benefit from the work of those that have gone before you, and leverage the efforts and thinking of the best lawyers from the top law firms and Fortune 500 companies, without all the hassle or expense.

Download warrant agreements from RealDealDocs today for the quick and easy way to use millions of legal agreements and clauses from top law firms across the US and around the world to your advantage.

To view any of the sample warrant contracts below, simply click on its title.

For advanced search click here. 



Warrant Agreements 





	These Warrant Agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) WARRANT TO PURCHASE STOCKParties: NUMEREX CORP /PA/ | KENNETH RAININ FOUNDATION | NUMEREX CORP 
								Law Firm: Kaye Scholer;Arnold Porter
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
2) NETLIST, INC. STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: NETLIST INC | NETLIST, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
3) Form of Representative's Warrant AgreementParties: DARIOHEALTH CORP. | ANYONE OTHER THAN (I) AEGIS CAPITAL CORP | DarioHealth Corp 
								Law Firm: Reed Smith;Sheppard Mullin;Sullivan Worcester
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
4) FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASEParties: WESTERN URANIUM CORP | Western Uranium Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017

5) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: BIOCEPT INC | BIOCEPT, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/30/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
6) WARRANT AGREEMENTParties: SILVER RUN ACQUISITION CORP II | CONTINENTAL STOCK TRANSFER  TRUST COMPANY | Riverstone VI SR II Holdings, LP | Silver Run Acquisition Corporation | Silver Run Sponsor II, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/29/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
7) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: SILVERSUN TECHNOLOGIES, INC. | SILVERSUN TECHNOLOGIES, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/29/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New Jersey
8) To Purchase Shares of Common StockParties: IDENTIV, INC. | Identiv, Inc | Opus Bank | WHICH MAY BE COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
9) AMPIO PHARMACEUTICALS AMENDS WARRANT AGREEMENTParties: AMPIO PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. | Ampio Pharmaceuticals, Inc | CVI Investments, Inc | ENGLEWOOD, CO 
								
								Document Date: 3/28/2017

10) REDEEMABLE COMMON STOCK PURCHASE CLASS A WARRANTParties: NOBLE ROMANS INC | NOBLE ROMAN'S, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/27/2017

11) WARRANT TO PURCHASE COMMON STOCKParties: NOVABAY PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. | NOVABAY PHARMACEUTICALS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
12) WARRANT TO PURCHASE COMMON STOCKParties: NOVABAY PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. | NOVABAY PHARMACEUTICALS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
13) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: NOVABAY PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. | NOVABAY PHARMACEUTICALS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
14) WARRANT TO PURCHASE COMMON STOCKParties: NOVABAY PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. | WARRANT SHOULD CONTACT NOVABAY PHARMACEUTICALS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
15) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: NEPHROS INC | NEPHROS, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017

16) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANT ALPHATEC HOLDINGS, INCParties: ALPHATEC HOLDINGS, INC. | ALPHATEC HOLDINGS, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017

17) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANT INTERPACE DIAGNOSTICS GROUP, INCParties: INTERPACE DIAGNOSTICS GROUP, INC. | Interpace Diagnostics Group, Inc | RedPath Equityholder Representative, LLC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								Law Firm: Buchanan Ingersoll;Pepper Hamilton
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
18) NEWS RELEASEParties: HYPERDYNAMICS CORP | Dennard-Lascar Associates | Hyperdynamics Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017

19) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: AETHLON MEDICAL INC | AETHLON MEDICAL, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/22/2017

20) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANT DYNATRONICS CORPORATIONParties: DYNATRONICS CORP | DYNATRONICS CORPORATION | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/22/2017

21) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: JERRICK MEDIA HOLDINGS, INC. | JERRICK MEDIA HOLDINGS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/21/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
22) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: TOMI ENVIRONMENTAL SOLUTIONS, INC. | TOMI ENVIRONMENTAL SOLUTIONS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/21/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Florida
23) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: NEURALSTEM, INC. | NEURALSTEM, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/20/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
24) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: OROPLATA RESOURCES, INC. | OROPLATA RESOURCES, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
25) WARRANT TO PURCHASE SHARES OF COMMON STOCKParties: VIEWRAY, INC. | ViewRay, Inc 
								Law Firm: Latham Watkins
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
26) FORM OF COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: BIOPTIX, INC. | BIOPTIX, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/17/2017

27) WARRANT TO PURCHASE SHARES OF COMMON STOCK OF AERPIO PHARMACEUTICALS, INCParties: AERPIO PHARMACEUTICALS, INC. | AERPIO PHARMACEUTICALS, INC 
								Law Firm: Goodwin Procter
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:United States Of America
28) [FORM OF WARRANT ? 5 YEAR TRANCHE]Parties: ANTHERA PHARMACEUTICALS INC | ANTHERA PHARMACEUTICALS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/16/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
29) FORM OF COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: BIOPTIX, INC. | BIOPTIX, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/16/2017

30) [FORM OF WARRANT ?6 MONTH TRANCHE]Parties: ANTHERA PHARMACEUTICALS INC | ANTHERA PHARMACEUTICALS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/16/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
31) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: CYTRX CORP | Emmanuel Strategic Partners | Holder and CytRx Corporation | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
32) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: CYTRX CORP | Emmanuel Strategic Partners | Holder and CytRx Corporation | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
33) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: DIFFUSION PHARMACEUTICALS INC. | DIFFUSION PHARMACEUTICALS INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017

34) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANT CAREDX, INCParties: CAREDX, INC. | CAREDX, INC | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
35) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: CYTRX CORP | CYTRX CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017

36) CONTINGENT COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: CYTRX CORP | Bristol Capital Advisors, LLC | CYTRX CORPORATION | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
37) WARRANT AGREEMENTParties: MATLIN  PARTNERS ACQUISITION CORP | Cantor Fitzgerald  Co | CF  Co | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | MATLIN  PARTNERS ACQUISITION CORPORATION | Matlin  Partners Acquisition Sponsor LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
38) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: ECOARK HOLDINGS, INC. | ECOARK HOLDINGS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/14/2017

39) WARRANT TO PURCHASE STOCKParties: YEXT, INC. | Alpha Creations Corporation | Silicon Valley Bank | SVB Financial Group 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
40) WARRANT TO PURCHASE COMMON STOCKParties: OKTA, INC. | Okta, Inc | Silicon Valley Bank | SVB Financial Group 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
41) FORM OF WARRANT TO PURCHASE COMMON STOCKParties: GEMPHIRE THERAPEUTICS INC. | GEMPHIRE THERAPEUTICS INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
42) WARRANT TO PURCHASE STOCKParties: OKTA, INC. | OKTA, INC | Silicon Valley Bank | SVB Financial Group 
								Law Firm: Goodwin Procter
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
43) YEXT, INC. COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: YEXT, INC. | One Degree Partners | YEXT, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
44) WARRANT TO PURCHASE STOCKParties: YEXT, INC. | Alpha Creations Corporation | SILICON VALLEY BANK | SVB Financial Group | Yext, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
45) WARRANT AGREEMENTParties: AUDENTES THERAPEUTICS, INC. | COMPANY:AUDENTES THERAPEUTICS, INC | Hercules Capital, Inc | Hercules Technology III, LP | WHICH MAY BE COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
46) YEXT, INC. COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: YEXT, INC. | Crunch Fund I GP, LLC | Greenough Group | YEXT, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
47) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: CEL SCI CORP | CEL-SCI CORPORATION | SECURITIES COMMISSION 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

48) Second Sight Medical Products, Inc. Announces Completion of Oversubscribed Rights OfferingParties: SECOND SIGHT MEDICAL PRODUCTS INC | Second Sight Medical Products, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

49) WARRANT TO PURCHASE STOCKParties: TOCAGEN INC | Oxford Finance LLC | Silicon Valley Bank 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
50) COMMON STOCK PURCHASE WARRANTParties: DIGITAL POWER CORP | DIGITAL POWER CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778798081828384858687888990919293949596979899100101102103104105106107108109110111112113114115116117118119120121122123124125126127128129130131132133134135136137138139140141142143144145146147148149150151152153154155156157158159160161162163164165166167168169170171172173174175176177178179180181182183184185186187188189190191192193194195196197198199200201202203204205206207208209210211212213214215216217218219220221222223224225226227228229230231232233234235236237238239240241242243244245246247248249250251252253254255256257258259260261262263264265266267268269270271272 
 
 

 


















Warrant Agreement - Warrant Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Warrant Agreement     > WARRANT AGREEMENT

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Warrant Agreement
Warrant Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Warrant Agreement involves EAGLELINE ACQUISITION CORP. | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | Eagle Acquisition Corp | Eagle Acquisition Sponsor, LLC. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: WARRANT AGREEMENT Governing Law: New York      Date: 10/14/2016 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day









Exhibit 4.4
 
EAGLE ACQUISITION CORP.
 
and
 
Continental Stock Transfer & Trust
Company
 
WARRANT AGREEMENT
 
Dated as of [•], 2016
 

THIS WARRANT AGREEMENT (this “
Agreement ”), dated as of [•], 2016, is by and
between Eagle Acquisition Corp., a Delaware corporation (the
“ Company ”), and Continental Stock Transfer
& Trust Company, as warrant agent (in such capacity, the
“ Warrant Agent ”).

 

WHEREAS, it is proposed that the
Company enter into that certain Sponsor Warrants Purchase Agreement
(the “ Private Placement Warrants Purchase Agreement
”), with Eagle Acquisition Sponsor, LLC, a Delaware limited
liability company (the “ Sponsor ”), pursuant to
which the Sponsor will purchase an aggregate of up to 6,037,500
warrants (including up to 562,500 warrants subject to the
Over-allotment Option (as defined below)) simultaneously with the
closing of the Offering (as defined below), bearing the legend set
forth in Exhibit B hereto (the “ Private Placement
Warrants ”) at a purchase price of $1.00 per Private
Placement Warrant;

 

WHEREAS, the Company is engaged in
an initial public offering (the “ Offering ”) of
units of the Company’s equity securities, each such unit
comprised of one share of Common Stock (as defined below) and
one-half of one Public Warrant (as defined below) (the “
Units ”) and, in connection therewith, has determined
to issue and deliver up to 8,625,000 warrants (including up to
1,125,000 warrants if the Over-allotment Option is exercised in
full) to public investors in the Offering (the “ Public
Warrants ” and, together with the Private Placement
Warrants, the “ Warrants ”). Each whole Warrant
entitles the holder thereof to purchase one share of Class A
common stock of the Company, par value $0.0001 per share (“
Common Stock ”), for $11.50 per share, subject to
adjustment as described herein. Only whole Warrants are
exercisable;

 

WHEREAS, the Company has filed with
the Securities and Exchange Commission (the “
Commission ”) a registration statement on Form S-1,
No. 333-[•] (the “ Registration Statement
”) and prospectus (the “ Prospectus ”),
for the registration, under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended
(the “ Securities Act ”), of the Units, the
Public Warrants and the shares of Common Stock included in the
Units;

 

WHEREAS, the Company desires the
Warrant Agent to act on behalf of the Company, and the Warrant
Agent is willing to so act, in connection with the issuance,
registration, transfer, exchange, redemption and exercise of the
Warrants;

 

WHEREAS, the Company desires to
provide for the form and provisions of the Warrants, the terms upon
which they shall be issued and exercised, and the respective
rights, limitation of rights, and immunities of the Company, the
Warrant Agent, and the holders of the Warrants; and

 

WHEREAS, all acts and things have
been done and performed which are necessary to make the Warrants,
when executed on behalf of the Company and countersigned by or on
behalf of the Warrant Agent, as provided herein, the valid, binding
and legal obligations of the Company, and to authorize the
execution and delivery of this Agreement.

 

 



 


 

NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of
the mutual agreements herein contained, the parties hereto agree as
follows:

 




1.


Appointment
of Warrant Agent . The
Company hereby appoints the Warrant Agent to act as agent for the
Company for the Warrants, and the Warrant Agent hereby accepts such
appointment and agrees to perform the same in accordance with the
terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement.




 




2.


Warrants .




 




2.1


Effect of
Countersignature . If a
physical certificate is issued, unless and until countersigned by
the Warrant Agent pursuant to this Agreement, a Warrant shall be
invalid and of no effect and may not be exercised by the holder
thereof.




 




2.2


Registration .




 




2.2.1


Warrant
Register . The Warrant
Agent shall maintain books (the “ Warrant Register
”), for the registration of original issuance and the
registration of transfer of the Warrants. Upon the initial issuance
of the Warrants in book-entry form, the Warrant Agent shall issue
and register the Warrants in the names of the respective holders
thereof in such denominations and otherwise in accordance with
instructions delivered to the Warrant Agent by the Company.
Ownership of beneficial interests in the Public Warrants shall be
shown on, and the transfer of such ownership shall be effected
through, records maintained by institutions that have accounts with
The Depository Trust Company (the “ Depositary
”) (such institution, with respect to a Warrant in its
account, a “ Participant ”).




 

If the Depositary subsequently
ceases to make its book-entry settlement system available for the
Public Warrants, the Company may instruct the Warrant Agent
regarding making other arrangements for book-entry settlement. In
the event that the Public Warrants are not eligible for, or it is
no longer necessary to have the Public Warrants available in,
book-entry form, the Warrant Agent shall provide written
instructions to the Depositary to deliver to the Warrant Agent for
cancellation each book-entry Public Warrant, and the Company shall
instruct the Warrant Agent to deliver to the Depositary definitive
certificates in physical form evidencing such Warrants which shall
be in the form annexed hereto as Exhibit A .

 

The certificates, if issued, shall
be signed by, or bear the facsimile signature of, the Chairman of
the Board, Chief Executive Officer (or, if applicable, any co-Chief
Executive Officer), Chief Financial Officer, Secretary or other
principal officer of the Company. In the event the person whose
facsimile signature has been placed upon any Warrant shall have
ceased to serve in the capacity in which such person signed the
Warrant before such Warrant is issued, it may be issued with the
same effect as if he or she had not ceased to be such at the date
of issuance.

 




2.2.2


Registered
Holder . Prior to due
presentment for registration of transfer of any Warrant, the
Company and the Warrant Agent may deem and treat the person in
whose name such Warrant is registered in the Warrant Register (the
“ Registered Holder ”) as the absolute owner of
such Warrant and of each Warrant represented thereby, for the
purpose of any exercise thereof, and for all other purposes, and
neither the Company nor the Warrant Agent shall be affected by any
notice to the contrary.




 




 



2



 






 


 




2.3


Detachability of Warrants
. The shares of Common Stock and
Public Warrants comprising the Units shall begin separate trading
on the 52nd day following the date of the Prospectus or, if such
52nd day is not on a day, other than a Saturday, Sunday or federal
holiday, on which banks in New York City are generally open for
normal business (a “ Business Day ”), then on
the immediately succeeding Business Day following such date, or
earlier (the “ Detachment Date ”) with the
consent of Stifel, Nicolaus & Company, Incorporated, FBR
Capital Markets & Co. and Stephens Inc., but in no event shall
the shares of Common Stock and the Public Warrants comprising the
Units be separately traded until (A) the Company has filed a
current report on Form 8-K with the Commission containing an
audited balance sheet reflecting the receipt by the Company of the
gross proceeds of the Offering, including the proceeds received by
the Company from the exercise by the underwriters of their right to
purchase additional Units in the Offering (the “
Over-allotment Option ”), if the Over-allotment Option
is exercised prior to the filing of the Form 8-K, and (B) the
Company issues a press release and files with the Commission a
current report on Form 8-K announcing when such separate trading
shall begin.




 




2.4


Private
Placement Warrants . The
Private Placement Warrants shall be identical to the Public
Warrants, except that so long as they are held by the Sponsor or
any of its Permitted Transferees (as defined below) the Private
Placement Warrants: (i) may be exercised for cash or on a
cashless basis, pursuant to subsection 3.3.1(c) hereof,
(ii) may not be transferred, assigned or sold until thirty
(30) days after the completion by the Company of an initial
Business Combination (as defined below), and (iii) shall not
be redeemable by the Company; provided , however ,
that in the case of (ii), the Private Placement Warrants and any
shares of Common Stock issued upon exercise of the Private
Placement Warrants may be transferred by the holders
thereof:




 




(a)


to the
Company’s officers or directors, any affiliates or family
members of any of the Company’s officers or directors, any
members of the Sponsor, or any affiliates of the
Sponsor;




 




(b)


in the case of
an individual, by gift to a member of the individual’s
immediate family or to a trust, the beneficiary of which is a
member of the individual’s immediate family or an affiliate
of such person, or to a charitable organization;




 




(c)


in the case of
an individual, by virtue of laws of descent and distribution upon
death of the individual;




 




(d)


in the case of
an individual, pursuant to a qualified domestic relations
order;




 




(e)


by private
sales or by transfers made in connection with the consummation of
the Company’s Business Combination at prices no greater than
the price at which the securities were originally
purchased;




 




(f)


in the event of
the Company’s liquidation prior to the Company’s
completion of an initial Business Combination;




 




(g)


by virtue of
the laws of the State of Delaware or the Sponsor’s limited
liability company agreement upon dissolution of the Sponsor;
and




 




 



3



 






 


 




(h)


in the event of
the Company’s completion of a liquidation, merger, stock
exchange or other similar transaction which results in all of the
Company’s stockholders having the right to exchange their
shares of Common Stock for cash, securities or other property
subsequent to the completion of the Company’s initial
Business Combination; provided , however , that, in
the case of clauses (a) through (e), these permitted
transferees (the “ Permitted Transferees ”) must
enter into a written agreement with the Company agreeing to be
bound by the transfer restrictions in this Agreement.




 




3.


Terms and
Exercise of Warrants .




 




3.1


Warrant
Price . Each Warrant
shall, when countersigned by the Warrant Agent, entitle the
Registered Holder thereof, subject to the provisions of such
Warrant and of this Agreement, to purchase from the Company the
number of shares of Common Stock stated therein, at the price of
$11.50 per share, subject to the adjustments provided in
Section 4 hereof and in the last sentence of this
Section 3.1 . The term “ Warrant Price
” as used in this Agreement shall mean the price per share at
which shares of Common Stock may be purchased at the time a Warrant
is exercised. The Company in its sole discretion may lower the
Warrant Price at any time prior to the Expiration Date (as defined
below) for a period of not less than twenty (20) Business
Days, provided, that the Company shall provide at least twenty
(20) days prior written notice of such reduction to Registered
Holders of the Warrants and, provided further that any such
reduction shall be identical among all of the Warrants.




 




3.2


Duration of
Warrants . A Warrant may
be exercised only during the period (the “ Exercise
Period ”) (A) commencing on the later of:
(i) the date that is thirty (30) days after the first
date on which the Company completes a merger, capital stock
exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization or
similar business combination, involving the Company and one or more
businesses (a “ Business Combination ”), and
(ii) the date that is twelve (12) months from the date of
the closing of the Offering, and (B) terminating at 5:00 p.m.,
New York City time on the earlier to occur of: (x) the date
that is five (5) years after the date on which the Company
completes its initial Business Combination, (y) the
liquidation of the Company in accordance with the Company’s
amended and restated certificate of incorporation, as amended from
time to time, if the Company fails to consummate a Business
Combination, and (z) other than with respect to the Private
Placement Warrants, the Redemption Date (as defined below) as
provided in Section 6.2 hereof (the “
Expiration Date ”); provided , however ,
that the exercise of any Warrant shall be subject to the
satisfaction of any applicable conditions, as set forth in
subsection 3.3.2 below, with respect to an effective
registration statement. Except with respect to the right to receive
the Redemption Price (as defined below) (other than with respect to
a Private Placement Warrant) in the event of a redemption (as set
forth in Section 6 hereof), each Warrant (other than a
Private Placement Warrant in the event of a redemption) not
exercised on or before the Expiration Date shall become void, and
all rights thereunder and all rights in respect thereof under this
Agreement shall cease at 5:00 p.m. New York City time on the
Expiration Date. The Company in its sole discretion may extend the
duration of the Warrants by delaying the Expiration Date;
provided , that the Company shall provide at least twenty
(20) days prior written notice of any such extension to
Registered Holders of the Warrants and, provided further that any
such extension shall be identical in duration among all the
Warrants.




 




 



4



 






 


 




3.3


Exercise of
Warrants .




 




3.3.1


Payment . Subject to the provisions of the Warrant and
this Agreement, a Warrant, when countersigned by the Warrant Agent,
may be exercised by the Registered Holder thereof by surrendering
it, at the office of the Warrant Agent, or at the office of its
successor as Warrant Agent, together with (i) an election to
purchase form, duly executed, electing to exercise such Warrants
and (ii) payment in full of the Warrant Price for each full
share of Common Stock as to which the Warrant is exercised and any
and all applicable taxes due in connection with the exercise of the
Warrant, the exchange of the Warrant for the shares of Common Stock
and the issuance of such shares of Common Stock, as
follows:




 




(a)


in lawful money
of the United States, in good certified check or good bank draft
payable to the order of the Warrant Agent;




 




(b)


in the event of
a redemption pursuant to Section 6 hereof in which the
Company’s board of directors (the “ Board
”) has elected to require all holders of the Warrants to
exercise such Warrants on a “cashless basis,” by
surrendering the Warrants for that number of shares of Common Stock
equal to the quotient obtained by dividing (x) the product of
the number of shares of Common Stock underlying the Warrants,
multiplied by the difference between the Warrant Price and the
“Fair Market Value”, as defined in this subsection
3.3.1(b) , by (y) the Fair Market Value. Solely for
purposes of this subsection 3.3.1(b) and
Section 6.3 , the “Fair Market Value” shall
mean the average last sale price of the Common Stock for the ten
(10) trading days ending on the third trading day prior to the
date on which the notice of redemption is sent to the holders of
the Warrants, pursuant to Section 6 hereof;




 




(c)


with respect to
any Private Placement Warrant, so long as such Private Placement
Warrant is held by the Sponsor or its Permitted Transferee, by
surrendering the Warrants for that number of shares of Common Stock
equal to the quotient obtained by dividing (x) the product of
the number of shares of Common Stock underlying the Warrants,
multiplied by the difference between the Warrant Price and the
“Fair Market Value”, as defined in this subsection
3.3.1(c) , by (y) the Fair Market Value. Solely for
purposes of this subsection 3.3.1(c) , the “Fair
Market Value” shall mean the average last sale price of the
Common Stock for the ten (10) trading days ending on the third
trading day prior to the date on which notice of exercise of the
Warrant is sent to the Warrant Agent; or




 




(d)


as provided in
Section 7.4 hereof.




 




 



5



 






 


 




3.3.2


Issuance of
Shares of Common Stock on Exercise . As soon as practicable after the exercise of
any Warrant and the clearance of the funds in payment of the
Warrant Price (if payment is pursuant to subsection 3.3.1(a)
), the Company shall issue to the Registered Holder of such Warrant
a book-entry position or certificate, as applicable, for the number
of full shares of Common Stock to which he, she or it is entitled,
registered in such name or names as may be directed by him, her or
it, and if such Warrant shall not have been exercised in full, a
new book-entry position or countersigned Warrant, as applicable,
for the number of shares as to which such Warrant shall not have
been exercised. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Company shall
not be obligated to deliver any shares of Common Stock pursuant to
the exercise of a Warrant and shall have no obligation to settle
such Warrant exercise unless a registration statement under the
Securities Act with respect to the shares of Common Stock
underlying the Public Warrants is then effective and a prospectus
relating thereto is current, subject to the Company’s
satisfying its obligations under Section 7.4 . No
Warrant shall be exercisable and the Company shall not be obligated
to issue shares of Common Stock upon exercise of a Warrant unless
the shares of Common Stock issuable upon such Warrant exercise have
been registered, qualified or deemed to be exempt under the
securities laws of the state of residence of the Registered Holder
of the Warrants. In the event that the conditions in the two
immediately preceding sentences are not satisfied with respect to a
Warrant, the holder of such Warrant shall not be entitled to
exercise such Warrant and such Warrant may have no value and expire
worthless, in which case the purchaser of a Unit containing such
Public Warrants shall have paid the full purchase price for the
Unit solely for the shares of Common Stock underlying such Unit.
Subject to Section 4.6 of this Agreement, a Registered
Holder of Warrants may exercise its Warrants only for a whole
number of shares of Common Stock (i.e., only an even number of
Warrants may be exercised at any given time by a Registered
Holder). The Company may require holders of Public Warrants to
settle the Warrant on a “cashless basis” pursuant to
Section 7.4 . If, by reason of any exercise of warrants
on a “cashless basis”, the holder of any Warrant would
be entitled, upon the exercise of such Warrant, to receive a
fractional interest in a share of Common Stock, the Company shall
round down to the nearest whole number, the number of shares of
Common Stock to be issued to such holder.




 




3.3.3


Valid
Issuance . All shares of
Common Stock issued upon the proper exercise of a Warrant in
conformity with this Agreement shall be validly issued, fully paid
and nonassessable.




 




3.3.4


Date of
Issuance . Each person in
whose name any book-entry position or certificate, as applicable,
for shares of Common Stock is issued shall for all purposes be
deemed to have become the holder of record of such shares of Common
Stock on the date on which the Warrant, or book-entry position
representing such Warrant, was surrendered and payment of the
Warrant Price was made, irrespective of the date of delivery of
such certificate in the case of a certificated Warrant, except
that, if the date of such surrender and payment is a date when the
share transfer books of the Company or book-entry system of the
Warrant Agent are closed, such person shall be deemed to have
become the holder of such shares at the close of business on the
next succeeding date on which the share transfer books or
book-entry system are open.




 




 



6



 






 


 




3.3.5


Maximum
Percentage . A holder of
a Warrant may notify the Company in writing in the event it elects
to be subject to the provisions contained in this subsection
3.3.5 ; however , no holder of a Warrant shall be
subject to this subsection 3.3.5 unless he, she or it makes
such election. If the election is made by a holder, the Warrant
Agent shall not affect the exercise of the holder’s Warrant,
and such holder shall not have the right to exercise such Warrant,
to the extent that after giving effect to such exercise, such
person (together with such person’s affiliates), to the
Warrant Agent’s actual knowledge, would beneficially own in
excess of 9.8% (the “ Maximum Percentage ”) of
the shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after giving
effect to such exercise. For purposes of the foregoing sentence,
the aggregate number of shares of Common Stock beneficially owned
by such person and its affiliates shall include the number of
shares of Common Stock issuable upon exercise of the Warrant with
respect to which the determination of such sentence is being made,
but shall exclude shares of Common Stock that would be issuable
upon (x) exercise of the remaining, unexercised portion of the
Warrant beneficially owned by such person and its affiliates and
(y) exercise or conversion of the unexercised or unconverted
portion of any other securities of the Company beneficially owned
by such person and its affiliates (including, without limitation,
any convertible notes or convertible preferred stock or warrants)
subject to a limitation on conversion or exercise analogous to the
limitation contained herein. Except as set forth in the preceding
sentence, for purposes of this paragraph, beneficial ownership
shall be calculated in accordance with Section 13(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “
Exchange Act ”). For purposes of the Warrant, in
determining the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock, the
holder may rely on the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock
as reflected in (1) the Company’s most recent annual
report on Form 10-K, quarterly report on Form 10-Q, current report
on Form 8-K or other public filing with the Commission as the case
may be, (2) a more recent public announcement by the Company
or (3) any other notice by the Company or Continental Stock
Transfer & Trust Company (in such capacity, the “
Transfer Agent ”) setting forth the number of shares
of Common Stock outstanding. For any reason at any time, upon the
written request of the holder of the Warrant, the Company shall,
within two (2) Business Days, confirm orally and in writing to
such holder the number of shares of Common Stock then outstanding.
In any case, the number of outstanding shares of Common Stock shall
be determined after giving effect to the conversion or exercise of
equity securities of the Company by the holder and its affiliates
since the date as of which such number of outstanding shares of
Common Stock was reported. By written notice to the Company, the
holder of a Warrant may from time to time increase or decrease the
Maximum Percentage applicable to such holder to any other
percentage specified in such notice; provided ,
however , that any such increase shall not be effective
until the sixty-first (61st) day after such notice is
delivered to the Company.




 




 



7



 






 


 




4.


Adjustments .




 




4.1


Stock
Dividends .




 




4.1.1


Split-Ups . If after the date hereof, and subject to the
provisions of Section 4.6 below, the number of
outstanding shares of Common Stock is increased by a stock dividend
payable in shares of Common Stock, or by a split-up of shares of
Common Stock or other similar event, then, on the effective date of
such stock dividend, split-up or similar event, the number of
shares of Common Stock issuable on exercise of each Warrant shall
be increased in proportion to such increase in the outstanding
shares of Common Stock. A rights offering to holders of shares of
Common Stock entitling holders to purchase shares of Common Stock
at a price less than the “Fair Market Value” (as
defined below) shall be deemed a stock dividend of a number of
shares of Common Stock equal to the product of (i) the number
of shares of Common Stock actually sold in such rights offering (or
issuable under any other equity securities sold in such rights
offering that are convertible into or exercisable for the shares of
Common Stock) multiplied by (ii) one (1) minus the
quotient of (x) the price per share of Common Stock paid in
such rights offering divided by (y) the Fair Market Value. For
purposes of this subsection 4.1.1 , (i) if the rights
offering is for securities convertible into or exercisable for
shares of Common Stock, in determining the price payable for shares
of Common Stock, there shall be taken into account any
consideration received for such rights, as well as any additional
amount payable upon exercise or conversion and (ii) “Fair
Market Value” means the volume weighted average price of the
Common Stock as reported during the ten (10) trading day
period ending on the trading day prior to the first date on which
the shares of Common Stock trade on the applicable exchange or in
the applicable market, regular way, without the right to receive
such rights.




 




4.1.2


Extraordinary Dividends . If the Company, at any time while the Warrants
are outstanding and unexpired, shall pay a dividend or make a
distribution in cash, securities or other assets to the holders of
the shares of Common Stock on account of such shares of Common
Stock (or other shares of the Company’s capital stock into
which the Warrants are convertible), other than (a) as
described in subsection 4.1.1 above, (b) Ordinary Cash
Dividends (as defined below), (c) to satisfy the redemption
rights of the holders of the shares of Common Stock in connection
with a proposed initial Business Combination, (d) to satisfy
the redemption rights of the holders of the shares of Common Stock
in connection with a vote to amend the Company’s amended and
restated certificate of incorporation pursuant to Section 9.7
thereof, (e) as a result of the repurchase of shares of Common
Stock by the Company if a proposed initial Business Combination is
presented to the stockholders of the Company for approval or
(f) in connection with the redemption of public shares upon
the failure of the Company to complete its initial Business
Combination and any subsequent distribution of its assets upon its
liquidation (any such non-excluded event being referred to herein
as an “ Extraordinary Dividend ”), then the
Warrant Price shall be decreased, effective immediately after the
effective date of such Extraordinary Dividend, by the amount of
cash and/or the fair market value (as determined by the Board, in
good faith) of any securities or other assets paid on each share of
Common Stock in respect of such Extraordinary Dividend. For
purposes of this subsection 4.1.2 , “ Ordinary Cash
Dividends ” means any cash dividend or cash distribution
which, when combined on a per share basis, with the per share
amounts of all other cash dividends and cash distributions paid on
the shares of Common Stock during the 365-day period ending on the
date of declaration of such dividend or distribution (as adjusted
to appropriately reflect any of the events referred to in other
subsections of this Section 4 and excluding cash
dividends or cash distributions that resulted in an adjustment to
the Warrant Price or to the number of shares of Common Stock
issuable on exercise of each Warrant) does not exceed $[•]
(being [•]% of the offering price of the Units in the
Offering).




 




 



8



 






 


 




4.2


Aggregation
of Shares . If after the
date hereof, and subject to the provisions of
Section 4.6 hereof, the number of outstanding shares of
Common Stock is decreased by a consolidation, combination, reverse
stock split or reclassification of shares of Common Stock or other
similar event, then, on the effective date of such consolidation,
combination, reverse stock split, reclassification or similar
event, the number of shares of Common Stock issuable on exercise of
each Warrant shall be decreased in proportion to such decrease in
outstanding shares of Common Stock.




 




4.3


Adjustments
in Exercise Price .
Whenever the number of shares of Common Stock purchasable upon the
exercise of the Warrants is adjusted, as provided in subsection
4.1.1 or Section 4.2 above, the Warrant Price shall
be adjusted (to the nearest cent) by multiplying such Warrant Price
immediately prior to such adjustment by a fraction (x) the
numerator of which shall be the number of shares of Common Stock
purchasable upon the exercise of the Warrants immediately prior to
such adjustment, and (y) the denominator of which shall be the
number of shares of Common Stock so purchasable immediately
thereafter.




 




 



9



 






 


 




4.4


Replacement
of Securities upon Reorganization, etc . In case of any reclassification or
reorganization of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (other
than a change under Section 4.1 or
Section 4.2 hereof or that solely affects the par value
of such shares of Common Stock), or in the case of any merger or
consolidation of the Company with or into another corporation
(other than a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the
continuing corporation and that does not result in any
reclassification or reorganization of the outstanding shares of
Common Stock), or in the case of any sale or conveyance to another
corporation or entity of the assets or other property of the
Company as an entirety or substantially as an entirety in
connection with which the Company is dissolved, the holders of the
Warrants shall thereafter have the right to purchase and receive,
upon the basis and upon the terms and conditions specified in the
Warrants and in lieu of the shares of Common Stock of the Company
immediately theretofore purchasable and receivable upon the
exercise of the rights represented thereby, the kind and amount of
shares of stock or other securities or property (including cash)
receivable upon such reclassification, reorganization, merger or
consolidation, or upon a dissolution following any such sale or
transfer, that the holder of the Warrants would have received if
such holder had exercised his, her or its Warrant(s) immediately
prior to such event (the “ Alternative Issuance
” ); provided , however , that (i) if the
holders of the shares of Common Stock were entitled to exercise a
right of election as to the kind or amount of securities, cash or
other assets receivable upon such consolidation or merger, then the
kind and amount of securities, cash or other assets constituting
the Alternative Issuance for which each Warrant shall become
exercisable shall be deemed to be the weighted average of the kind
and amount received per share by the holders of the shares of
Common Stock in such consolidation or merger that affirmatively
make such election, and (ii) if a tender, exchange or
redemption offer shall have been made to and accepted by the
holders of the shares of Common Stock (other than a tender,
exchange or redemption offer made by the Company in connection with
redemption rights held by stockholders of the Company as provided
for in the Company’s amended and restated certificate of
incorporation or as a result of the repurchase of shares of Common
Stock by the Company if a proposed initial Business Combination is
presented to the stockholders of the Company for approval) under
circumstances in which, upon completion of such tender or exchange
offer, the maker thereof, together with members of any group
(within the meaning of Rule 13d-5(b)(1) under the Exchange Act) of
which such maker is a part, and together with any affiliate or
associate of such maker (within the meaning of Rule 12b-2 under the
Exchange Act) and any members of any such group of which any such
affiliate or associate is a part, own beneficially (within the
meaning of Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act) more than 50% of the
outstanding shares of Common Stock, the holder of a Warrant shall
be entitled to receive as the Alternative Issuance, the highest
amount of cash, securities or other property to which such holder
would actually have been entitled as a stockholder if such Warrant
holder had exercised the Warrant prior to the expiration of such
tender or exchange offer, accepted such offer and all of the shares
of Common Stock held by such holder had been purchased pursuant to
such tender or exchange offer, subject to adjustments (from and
after the consummation of such tender or exchange offer) as nearly
equivalent as possible to the adjustments provided for in this
Section 4 ; provided , further , that if
less than 70% of the consideration receivable by the holders of the
shares of Common Stock in the applicable event is payable in the
form of common stock in the successor entity that is listed for
trading on a national securities exchange or is quoted in an
established over-the-counter market, or is to be so listed for
trading or quoted immediately following such event, and if the
Registered Holder properly exercises the Warrant within thirty
(30) days following the public disclosure of the consummation
of such applicable event by the Company pursuant to a Current
Report on Form 8-K filed with the Commission, the Warrant Price
shall be reduced by an amount (in dollars) equal to the difference
of (i) the Warrant Price in effect prior to such reduction
minus (ii) (A) the Per Share Consideration (as defined
below) (but in no event less than zero) minus (B) the
Black-Scholes Warrant Value (as defined below). The “
Black-Scholes Warrant Value ” means the value of a
Warrant immediately prior to the consummation of the applicable
event based on the Black-Scholes Warrant Model for a Capped
American Call on Bloomberg Financial Markets (“
Bloomberg ”). For purposes of calculating such amount,
(1)  Section 6 of this Agreement shall be taken
into account, (2)&nbs





 








 


















Indemnification Agreement, Indemnification Agreement Template, Indemnification Agreement Sample - Free Indemnification Agreement Forms (page 1 Of 96)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Indemnification Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>





An indemnification agreement is also known as a ''hold harmless agreement. '' This is a document put in use to protect an individual or business from legal action. In the agreement, a party agrees to pay (''indemnitor'') for any liability incurred by a second party (''the indemintee''). You may use this type of document when you decide to let someone use your company's vehicle, and you want to protect yourself from a lawsuit should they cause damage to another's property. This agreement is often used for financial responsibilities.

Indemnity means to hold someone harmless for an action. By using this agreement, a party is not responsible for incidents or damages they did not cause. The document can hold a party free from legal action, fees, claims and losses. They are often used in insurance contexts.

Some parties may be considered high risk, and thus an indemnity agreement holds another party harmless. When renting an apartment, a renter may sign an agreement to not hold their landlord legally responsible in the event they were injured on the landlord's property. There may be additional clauses about negligence, state of governing law, and the scope of the activity an agreement covers.        



Indemnification Agreement, Indemnification Agreement Template, Indemnification Agreement Sample 






These example
  Indemnification Agreement or indeminity agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their
  clients. Use them as Indemnification Agreement samples, Indemnification Agreement templates,
  competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about
  transactions within a particular industry or sector. 




1) FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: COLUMBUS MCKINNON CORP | Columbus McKinnon Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
2) INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: MACK CALI REALTY CORP | Mack-Cali Realty Corporation | Mack-Cali Realty, LP | Rockpoint Growth and Income Real Estate Fund II, LP | Rockpoint Growth and Income Upper REIT II-A, LLC | Roseland Residential, LP | RPIIA-RLB, LLC | RRT, RPIIA-RLA, LLC 
								Law Firm: Gibson Dunn;Seyfarth Shaw
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
3) FORM OF INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: LINN ENERGY, INC. | Linn Energy, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
4) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: GLOBAL NET LEASE, INC. | Global Net Lease, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Maryland
5) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: PJT PARTNERS INC. | PJT Partners Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
6) FORM OF INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: PNM RESOURCES INC | PNM Resources, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New Mexico
7) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: GLOBAL NET LEASE, INC. | Global Net Lease, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Maryland
8) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: UNIT CORP | Unit Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
9) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: TELLURIAN INC. /DE/ | Tellurian Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
10) TARGA RESOURCES CORP. INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: TARGA RESOURCES CORP. | TARGA RESOURCES CORP 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
11) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: PARSLEY ENERGY, INC. | Parsley Energy, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
12) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: PARSLEY ENERGY, INC. | Parsley Energy, Inc | Risk Management 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
13) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENT (Executive Officers)Parties: COMPUTER TASK GROUP INC | Computer Task Group, Incorporated 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
14) JUNIPER NETWORKS, INC. INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: JUNIPER NETWORKS INC | JUNIPER NETWORKS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
15) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: WATTS WATER TECHNOLOGIES INC | Watts Water Technologies, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
16) DIRECTOR AND OFFICER INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: JAKKS PACIFIC INC | JAKKS Pacific, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
17) INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: INTUIT INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
18) [FORM OF] INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: FARMER BROTHERS CO | Farmer Bros Co 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
19) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: IPG PHOTONICS CORP | IPG Photonics Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/22/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
20) Indemnification AgreementParties: GRANDPARENTS.COM, INC. | Grandparentscom, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/21/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
21) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: ASHFORD HOSPITALITY TRUST INC | Ashford Hospitality Trust, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/21/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Maryland
22) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: AMERICAN FINANCE TRUST, INC | American Realty Capital Trust V, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/21/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Maryland
23) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: IMMUNOMEDICS INC | Immunomedics, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/16/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
24) INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: MATLIN  PARTNERS ACQUISITION CORP | Matlin  Partners Acquisition Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
25) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: ADGERO BIOPHARMACEUTICALS HOLDINGS, INC. | Adgero Biopharmaceuticals Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/14/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
26) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: BOSTON OMAHA CORP | Boston Omaha Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/13/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
27) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: VALERITAS HOLDINGS INC. | Valeritas Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
28) DIRECTOR INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: SG BLOCKS, INC. | SG Blocks, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
29) VAREX IMAGING CORPORATION INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: VAREX IMAGING CORP | VAREX IMAGING CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 1/30/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
30) ENVIRONMENTAL INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: STEADFAST APARTMENT REIT III, INC. | BERKELEY POINT CAPITAL LLC | STAR III SWEETWATER, LLC | Steadfast Apartment Advisor III, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/18/2017

31) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: ORAMED PHARMACEUTICALS INC. | Oramed Pharmaceuticals Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/11/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
32) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: VCA INC 
								
								Document Date: 1/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
33) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: INVITATION HOMES INC. | Invitation Homes Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Maryland
34) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: ENERGY XXI GULF COAST, INC. | Energy XXI Gulf Coast, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/6/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
35) ENVIRONMENTAL INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: STEADFAST APARTMENT REIT III, INC. | PNC BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION | STAR III CANYON RESORT, LLC | Steadfast Apartment Advisor III, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/4/2017

36) FORM OF INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: APOLLO ENDOSURGERY, INC. | Apollo Endosurgery, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 1/3/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
37) NEWS RELEASEParties: HARTFORD FINANCIAL SERVICES GROUP INC/DE | Berkshire Hathaway Inc | National Indemnity Company 
								
								Document Date: 1/3/2017

38) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS INC | Financial Institutions, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/30/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
39) INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: INSPIRED ENTERTAINMENT, INC. | HYDRA INDUSTRIES ACQUISITION CORP 
								Law Firm: Kramer Levin
								Document Date: 12/30/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
40) JOUNCE THERAPEUTICS, INC. FORM OF DIRECTOR INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: JOUNCE THERAPEUTICS, INC. | JOUNCE THERAPEUTICS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 12/30/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
41) JOUNCE THERAPEUTICS, INC. FORM OF OFFICER INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: JOUNCE THERAPEUTICS, INC. | JOUNCE THERAPEUTICS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 12/30/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
42) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: RAMACO RESOURCES, INC. | RAMACO DEVELOPMENT, LLC | RAMACO, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 12/29/2016

43) APPDYNAMICS, INC. INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: APPDYNAMICS INC | APPDYNAMICS, INC | Jon Avina, Wilson Sonsini Goodrich  Rosati, PC 
								Law Firm: Wilson Sonsini
								Document Date: 12/28/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
44) Form Of Indemnification AgreementParties: GRANDPARENTS.COM, INC. | Grandparentscom, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/27/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
45) TCEH CORP. FORM OF DIRECTOR INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: VISTRA ENERGY CORP | TCEH CORP 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
46) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: FUSE MEDICAL, INC. | Fuse Medical, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
47) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: FUSE MEDICAL, INC. | Fuse Medical, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
48) FORM OF INDEMNITY AGREEMENTParties: FINTECH ACQUISITION CORP. II | FINTECH ACQUISITION CORP 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
49) INDEMNIFICATION AGREEMENTParties: PERNIX THERAPEUTICS HOLDINGS, INC. | Pernix Therapeutics Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Maryland
50) INDEMNITY AGREEMENT (the " Agreement ")Parties: MITEL NETWORKS CORP | MITEL NETWORKS CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 12/22/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Ontario
 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778798081828384858687888990919293949596 
 
 

 












